
--------------------------------------------------------
bad camera  -144
5. inch display with the 5MP front camera placed right next to the earpiece.
 Device heating is very very quickly and the quality of the camera is not very good it is very normal quality only.
bad camera quality in indor conditions and same with video quality.
only rear camera bad front camera is gud for selfie  
Average camera quality.
3  Camera quality  both front and rear  is also very good   though not excellent 
The front camera is pathetic  5 megapixels maybe  but slow  blurry and unable to capture a decent still image even with the slightest of movement.
front camera is bit good  but rear camera images are coming as blurred.
The camera is very good  especially the front camera.
 1 Camera quality is very poor shown as 13 MP and 5 MP but seems as 8MP and 2MP .
Camera   Don t know what to say but it will not reach your expectations if you are expecting an awesome quality.
Good Rear Camera Quality for Still Images but not Great.
5 Camera  Both rear and front camera are good not the best.
front camera is really good.
The front facing 5mp camera is just average.
Camera is not good.
The camera is too good for 10k phone  both front and rear .
5. inch display with the 5MP front camera .
Camera Quality is also good but not a great performance.
They expected really good quality with 13 5  but this camera is not that good.
Two stars only for the battery and front camera.
The camera quality is not that great.
Video quality is too good looking like video camera quality but it occupies a lot of space of mobile.
Rear Camera quality is just average.
Front camera though a 5MP is pathetic.
Back camera is not so good it is average.
Camera is good in nicely lit areas but low light photography on this device is not really good.
There is some noise in both back and front camera while used in artificial light.
camera clarity both front and rear not good 
The quality of the camera is not too good.
Front camera is really good but back camera is just ok. 6.
3. poor camera quality  
rear camera is excellent but front camera is not that good but its fine in bright places
Camera quality is not good.
Even front camera has a timing problem with screen flash.
Overall under 10K it s a great phone to have if you are looking for a phone with good perfomance and average camera.
but look and feel is very cheap the worst part is camera both the camera front facing and rear camera is so cheap even i had yu yuphoria is has much better camera than k3 yesterday i got it after half and hour i made my mind to sell it even in loss .
camera quality is really bad.
13 Mp rear camera is good but 5 Mp front camera is average.
I dont know why some users have complained about camera quality  I found it really good  clear and with realistic colors.
the front camera is also like that in indoor lighting condition if you try to take a selfie you wont get a good quality image.
its givving problems after using 20 days like screen stops working also its camera quality is very low plus gets hang every time while multitasking.
GORILLA GLASSES is not a deal breaker  Camera quality is good   its on cooler side   n the touch is very responsive .
On daylight  both back 13MP  and front 5MP  camera are pretty decent and produce good quality pictures.
Main Camera takes worse pics than front camera.
Camera quality is OK or average.
camera quality is not good .
battery is good sound is very good feature is good and camera is not good enough but we can use 
The front camera is unsatisfactory.
Camera Quality is very Ordinary.
1 poor camera quality.
It s a nice and good phone though camera is bit slow but otherwise a good phone.
Camera boasts 13MP but quality is not so good.
2  Camera both rear and front camera quality is like shit
Rear camera 13 MP having very poor quality pics.
 Camera quality is good but not as specified
K3 note is really very good mobile battery also good camera clarity little low but good.
CAMERA   Excellent  Camera quality is excellent but the default camera application is not that good it take time to open  download google camera or camera 360 or some other apps .
Its getting heat while watching youtube videos and front camera.
Also camera quality is not upto the mark as compared to other same configuration like ASUSZENFONE2 having good camera.
13 MP rare and 5MP front camera with good Quality .
very poor quality of this mobile hanging very much and bad camera quality and i have been already returne to flipkart 
primary rear camera clarity was not good in indoor.
The camera is just plain bad  its good enough for social media.
and front camera is nice .
3. camera too good and selfie is great in day light 
Light weight  sensitive touch  nice camera and decent battery backup is what is required from a good smartphone.
But front camera is excellent.
 Who said its camera is ok ok. not good.
camera is very good rear 13mp and front 5mp also.
But front camera under low light is pathetic.
2 poor camera quality.
Picture quality is good in low light condition   picture in dark also good thanks to double Led Flash lot of camera improvement noted after 2nd update camera quality is good enough and justify 13 MP I do noticed that the camera takes more seconds to focus
Camera quality is pathetic  13MP  is equal to 5 MP
I m writing this comments after using my Lenovo K3 mobile from 2 months ago  its really worth  all the features are working awesome and camera quality is double super  13 MP Primary Camera 5 MP Secondary Camera   HD videos is good  With 16 GB internal storage  you can store more of your favourite photos  music and games worry.
Camera quality is decent you can click decent pictures still its definitely not 13MP.
Impressed with front camera eye blink  hand waving  voice features for the snap.
and camera quality is not good.
Extremely pathetic camera front cam is better sometimes
camera quality very poor.
the phone is good but i am facing problem in  MENU  HOME AND BACK BUTTON   IN NIGHT I AM NOT ABLE TO SEE ALL THIS 3 BUTTON the light of this button is not working also there is heating problem in this phone and also there is very fem setting available in camera option 
1  Average camera quality.
At the rear is the 13MP shooter with LED flash with 5MP front camera for selfie lovers.
front camera is average
every thing is ok  camera is not nice battery packup is worst honor 4x is better than this lenovo dont take this is not a good mobile take any other company mobiles dont take this mobile 
camera is not good .
camera is not good it s seems like a 8.
camera quality is perfect almost 900mb ram free and i got 45k an.
5MP front camera with beautification feature is a delight for Selfie lovers.
I have bought this phone 3 day ago but i disappointed with both camera picture quality.
Selfie camera is not good despite being 5MP.
It has 13MP rear and 5MP front camera  both camera did good performance  don t expect flagship like picture  I have used Mi4i as well for some days and believe me it did good performance from Mi4i  front camera snap good picture as it has beauty option enabled .
2. very poor quality rear camera as compared to other phone camera as per 13 mp.
Initially observed slight heating near ear piece and front camera but after firmware update it appears to be gone.
not so good as it is 13MP CAMERA.
2 Camera Quality is not good as given specification  13MP rear   5 MP front  and i tested in day   night.
front camera.
Its 5MP front camera does good job though.
Camera  front camera is better n rear camera is very bad to front camera.
5MP secondary camera works pretty well we capture good quality selfies.
picture quality is very poor like a VGA camera.
Battery Backup is ok and Rear Camera is below average even after using HDR mode.
After reading some reviews here i came across people bitching and moaning about how crappy the camera is   this is for those people  well were you expecting an dslr quality camera in Rs.
4 Worst camera Both back and front camera  we can t take photos dark places.
body is not good and camera flash problem some time and not good response when we use glass screen protector .awesome camera  209
5. inch display with the 5MP front camera placed right next to the earpiece.
While phone feature is good  camera is also decent  sound is good.
Rear camera is OK in daylight or with flash.
Display is good and camera also fine.
Selfie camera is capable of taking good selfies 
I was searching for good Camera with Full HD.
Rear Camera is awesome.
My micromax canvas 2 plus had better camera quality then this nitro.
Front camera is great for selfies and stuff.
Rear camera is good.
Really Good Camera
front camera is bit good  but rear camera images are coming as blurred.
The Rear camera is decent  but Front Camera  5MP  is Great.
Anyway  putting the dual flash on makes the camera quality rich even on low light.
Camera quality is very good even selfie with cam.
Camera is good  but in low light it gives average performance 
Poor Front Camera   For lenovo k3 back camera is acceptable in both low light and daylight.
very good camera quality .
Front camera as well as rear camera are pretty good.
5 Camera  Both rear and front camera are good not the best.
Camera   The front and rear camera both are promising and looks really good.
front camera is really good.
Front Camera is good with beautification feature it improves the picture quality.
I don t use camera on mobile much but the front cam on G2 seemed better than the K3 whereas the K3 seem to have a better rear snapper.
Good camera excellent full hd display.
the camera is good .
Very Good camera.
very good camera   wifi connectivity.
Back camera is not so good it is average.
Front camera quality fantastic
quality of camera is also good.
Front camera is so nice.
there are some other brands which have much more good camera than this one  the pictures are so natural and realistic.
Camera also is good.
Good rear camera quality.
Camera is good.
Camera is good 
Camera is good but could have been great.
The rear camera is still descent enough if you shoot pictures or videos outside in the sunlight but the front camera will take you back to the old VGA camera days  not at all worth it  not good for people  who love to click selfies more often.
heating problem in lenovo k3 note for 2 mint phone call and play musice   camera low quality picture and slow open start up   battery back up low this phone  restart problem  
Front Camera  good justify its 5MP resolution
rear camera is excellent but front camera is not that good but its fine in bright places
i don t feel the camera is bad as i never compare with professional stand alone camera quality.
Using this phone since last 15 days  no lag issues  battery backup is very good  camera is good  build quality is best  light weight  feels good in hand  display is the real killer.
good camera.
but look and feel is very cheap the worst part is camera both the camera front facing and rear camera is so cheap even i had yu yuphoria is has much better camera than k3 yesterday i got it after half and hour i made my mind to sell it even in loss .
13 Mp rear camera is good but 5 Mp front camera is average.
1. camera quality is good.
good camera 
Front camera is also good.
Lenovo K3 Note sports a 13MP rear camera  with auto focus and LED flash  and a 5MP front facing camera.
2  Camera is the best 13mp and 5mp really feels good.
Front camera is quite good quality.
High quality camera with high pixel density
On daylight  both back 13MP  and front 5MP  camera are pretty decent and produce good quality pictures.
camera is good  
Front camera is really good but back camera is just ok. 6.
Pros  Ocatcore  2GB RAM  16GB expandable upto 32GB  Anroid version Lollipop  Camera 13MP   5MP  quality is good  
Camera quality is OK or average.
 I have bought this phone at last month and i have facing some problem like hanging and heating issues in this phone  otherwise all over is good phn  Camera is very good.
Great phone with good camera good performance good UI awesome sound quality no lags or hangs a acceptable baery performance.
Selfie camera is very good.
Camera  Front camera is awesome for selfies.
Very good camera and video.
5 mpx front facing camera is good  it has beauty shot and 13mpx rear camera is decent.
finally it is awesome phone amazing camera quality and so much.
 Camera 13 MP with great Quality 
Camera is very good  more than my expectation.
Tocuh is superb  Camera Quality is also good.
It has an amazing camera quality  For 10k .
5MP secondary camera works pretty well we capture good quality selfies.
The front camera is 5mp and is doing a better job than the primary camera.
Camera 13 MP with great Quality 
Good Camera
most people give negative review for camera of k3 note and i too expected a poor quality camera.
Front camera is just satisfactory  rear camera is above average.
Rear camera is awesome with decent photos for the phone under 10K but it does take time for taking HDR photos.
 light weight  front camera is good rear camera is damn good it is a good phone for day to day users.
Rear camera is awesome but just in HDR mode.
Display and Camera quality is awesome with 401 ppi.
Rare Camera is fine and Front cam with beautification feature is Awesome .
very poor quality of this mobile hanging very much and bad camera quality and i have been already returne to flipkart 
None  But surely one can expect 8MP front camera next time from tech leader Lenovo .
Both front and back camera quality is good and even games like Nova 3 works fine.
Rear Camera is awesome in light but decreases clarity in low light.
Camera is good at day light but more pixelated at nights.
camera quality is good.
2 good front and rear camera
Something i like of this phone is voice quality  speed display  rear camera.
4  Camera is good in good light condition   Front   Rear  
The camera is very good  especially the front camera.
Good Camera Quality
Light weight  sensitive touch  nice camera and decent battery backup is what is required from a good smartphone.
battery performance is also average  camera quality is not as should be.
But front camera is excellent.
I recommend if you want a budget range phone with very good quality camera  this is the right choice.
camera is very good rear 13mp and front 5mp also.
Camera quality can be much better
I m writing this comments after using my Lenovo K3 mobile from 2 months ago  its really worth  all the features are working awesome and camera quality is double super  13 MP Primary Camera 5 MP Secondary Camera   HD videos is good  With 16 GB internal storage  you can store more of your favourite photos  music and games worry.
Camera is good
Camera quality is so good front cam is better than back cam 
Camera quality great Faster for other phone and much more 
It is not seems to be a 13 MP rear camera and 5MP front camera.
Camera back camera excellent picture quality  bright coluors   colour reproduction is good.
Primary Camera is very good
and front camera is nice .
Good camera quality
rear camera picture quality is superb
good camera
have a better front camera for better selfies.
Good camera at his price point
The display clarity and camera quality is commendable.
the phone is good but i am facing problem in  MENU  HOME AND BACK BUTTON   IN NIGHT I AM NOT ABLE TO SEE ALL THIS 3 BUTTON the light of this button is not working also there is heating problem in this phone and also there is very fem setting available in camera option 
Camera quality is amazing.
Good quality picture   sound   Rear camera picture very good .
2  Good camera quality  excellent in outdoor conditions  indoor is decent .
n camera quality so good.
Camera is really Live and good.
Good camera quality.
4  The camera quality is good in fact very good for a 10k mobile and the interface and speed is really impressive.
 Friends  I am using this phone for past 10 days   its battery backup is very good  camera quality is very very good equivalent to samsung phone quality.
camera quality is perfect almost 900mb ram free and i got 45k an.
At the price of Rs 9 999 this phone is a pretty good upgrade over its sibling A7000  the user experience is much superior  the camera performance is better  the multimedia performance is at a whole new level altogether  and it costs just Rs 1 000 more than A7000.
Front Camera is good for selfie loving people
3  The front facing camera is good and performs well.
Front camera is good and rear camera produces good picture when having steady hand.
The camera is very good and the battery backup is for 2 days even if you play games  listen to songs or watch videos.
13MP Primary camera gives you a good clarity pictures.
It has 13MP rear and 5MP front camera  both camera did good performance  don t expect flagship like picture  I have used Mi4i as well for some days and believe me it did good performance from Mi4i  front camera snap good picture as it has beauty option enabled .
13 MP rare and 5MP front camera with good Quality .
Regarding Usage its good till now  Display is awesome  camera quality is good for Primary Camera  slim design  light weight  dual micro sim set  sound is good.
Camera is good with flash   HDR on.
Camera quality is good as per budget but if we compare to Samsung Galaxy S4 S5 or MI 4I  then it lacks in various terms 
Front camera is good.
But low light photography without flash does attract a lot of notice  same with the 5MP front camera its low light images are not impressive.
 HD Display is simply awesome  camera is good with some features.
Camera is good and provides just what you need.
It is as smooth as butter very fast  multitasking is great  camera is good i have compare live with lenova.
Rear camera is awesome
No android update till date  camera is not as good as 13 mpx Samsung  Gionee  Xiaomi  many times become unresponsive  overall an okay phone  the best thing is its call quality.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad_sound  -53
Sound through speaker is not so loud but is of good quality  experience dolby sound with branded headphones.
and camera quality is not good.
Overall a good phone but very poor quality of sound especially when you are in a call.
Build quality is ok as it has got the plastic body  performance looks excellent  FHD screen rocks for videos and games though games are yet to be tested  DOLBY ATMOS speakers are super hit and sounds top notch.
Build and form factor  Slim  light in weight and visually feels good in hand though not of very great build quality as compared to the competing leaders in the same segment.
Please don t consider other reviews saying about Heat issues and low sound quality issues.
And that too these specs at the low cost of 9999 and you are expecting a high quality headphones is not good.
 Sound quality is not good
9. call quality good with good sound quality  
2  No Earphone so compatible earphone is issue  bad Sound Quality in Moto Earphone 
Camera quality is not good.
1  Sound   speaker quality is so poor that you would feel like talking to people who is living 1000s and thousands of miles away in African dense jungle.
You need a good screen protector  Lenovo provides one of average quality  in the sales package  
Sound quality when you are calling is so poor.
The 1080p videos though looked great with loud sound.
you wont get a good quality picture for uploading in social networking sites.
Sound is really loud and clear for music or watching movies or even cellular calls.
I dont know why some users have complained about camera quality  I found it really good  clear and with realistic colors.
the front camera is also like that in indoor lighting condition if you try to take a selfie you wont get a good quality image.
Sound quality is way too awesome due to Dolby Atmos provided.
It s not too loud  but good quality sound.
Sound is very slow when set below 70  volume control.
Plastics used are not of very good quality.
speakers are also good but while connected to headphones the sound quality is just too awesome.
Dolby sound is too good.
camera quality is not good .
 Not good quality of rear and front
battery is good sound is very good feature is good and camera is not good enough but we can use 
Then my first vote is to moto E  sound quality  and second to YU Yureka  Cyanogen OS  and lenovo k3 note.
Cons  Well not too many but some people might be disappointed to know that no earphones provided in box  but personally I feel that s okay cause I anyway do not use stock earphones and buy good quality ones 
Picture quality is good in low light condition   picture in dark also good thanks to double Led Flash lot of camera improvement noted after 2nd update camera quality is good enough and justify 13 MP I do noticed that the camera takes more seconds to focus
Sound quality is not that good.
2 Camera Quality is not good as given specification  13MP rear   5 MP front  and i tested in day   night.
GORILLA GLASSES is not a deal breaker  Camera quality is good   its on cooler side   n the touch is very responsive .
I could feel power and volume button making a small sound if the phone is shaken. 
you should not give very nice sound quality of headphone on the site if you not giving one.
Average sound quality  
 very bad quality of sound and speaker
Camera Quality is also good but not a great performance.
They expected really good quality with 13 5  but this camera is not that good.
I m writing this comments after using my Lenovo K3 mobile from 2 months ago  its really worth  all the features are working awesome and camera quality is double super  13 MP Primary Camera 5 MP Secondary Camera   HD videos is good  With 16 GB internal storage  you can store more of your favourite photos  music and games worry.
Camera boasts 13MP but quality is not so good.
Video quality is too good looking like video camera quality but it occupies a lot of space of mobile.
But charging time its long  4 to 5 hours  and loud speaker sound quality is not satisfy me.
Sound  speaker sound is loud enough to hear ringtone in traffic and public places
 Camera quality is good but not as specified
Lenovo name is missing in front   battery backup not so good  built quality is just ok   plastic look  no corning gorilla glass  not easy to fit in hand.
CAMERA   Excellent  Camera quality is excellent but the default camera application is not that good it take time to open  download google camera or camera 360 or some other apps .
Audio is clear with good quality but not louder on speakergood sound  107
I agree the sound is good.
no lag even taking good quality images.
good sound quality.
Everything else like processing speed  display quality  sound are very good.
it was good for first month  but now mic is not working properly  i can hear everything over call but other person is not getting any sound or very low sound.
Screen quality is also good 
Though the speaker is just average  but if you have a great pair of headphones  this will turn out to be your Home theater system  one of the best sound qualities you get.
2. sound quality is pretty good  to experience dolby effect i suggest use good quality earphone i am using earphone of sony.
Camera quality is very good even selfie with cam.
It s loud enough  but it just makes everything sound like it s playing in an empty can.
I recommend if you want a budget range phone with very good quality camera  this is the right choice.
Build quality is very good.
its overall performance is very good and it give more battery backup   display is good   touch is good and sound quality is better with Dolby sound system .
Infact sound quality is pretty good.
bad quality battery fast drain use WiFi and play game phone heat battery problem is major problem good idea not buy this phone 
Sound quality with Dolby Atmos is very good.
Average sound quality  
good sound quality and it has Dolby Atmos
2  Good sound quality
The sound quality is just fabulous.
you can play good Quality of Game no issues.
Speaker quality is also good.
Sound is good  clear   louder.
Call quality is good and speaker and phone volume levels are good enough and the menu and default interface are already suiting my requirements.
means they say on the site very nice sound quality on putting headphone but how can hear it without original headphone.
9. call quality good with good sound quality  
Dolby Sound is nice
Good Quality and condition  faster delivery
Display Quality is really good
Excellent Sound Quality earphone  speaker  Dobly feature is awesome.
But do rember a loaded phone with SD card  tempered glass and good quality ear phones would be 11.
Sound is great.
2. sound is good
Good quality sound if listening through quality head phones.
Front camera is quite good quality.
On daylight  both back 13MP  and front 5MP  camera are pretty decent and produce good quality pictures.
Pros  Ocatcore  2GB RAM  16GB expandable upto 32GB  Anroid version Lollipop  Camera 13MP   5MP  quality is good  
The back cover is thin but of good quality and as i received the white color its actually pearl white .
Sound Quality is good.
Lenovo has good sound call quality.
Dolby music system is awesome with good sound quality.
Sound is good as you increase beyond the halfway mark.
5MP secondary camera works pretty well we capture good quality selfies.
Tocuh is superb  Camera Quality is also good.
sound is extraordinary.
Display is awesome in Full HD and sound quality is also really good in both Speaker and Headphone  I use JBL headset .
Sound Quality .
Sound quality is excellent and can beat any good system.
Even with that  the sound quality is decent.
Wonderful sound experience.
excellent sound .
Good sound quality through Dolby Atmos equalizer
screen quality is good.
Display quality is very good
Both front and back camera quality is good and even games like Nova 3 works fine.
It s not too loud  but good quality sound.
camera quality is good.
Sound quality good
Processing speed Game  and Sound quality are are awesome but there are some problem in this phone
GOOD SOUND
Audio quality is good.
5. both sims support 4G which is good thing and the network strength and call quality is good.
What is show stopper in this phone is its dolby digital sound what a clarity especially 3D effect on headphones.
CALL  Good  call quality is also good and clear .
Audio and display quality it is good.
Sound is good better than a7000 6000 but yu have slide edge.
Excellent sound quality
1  The display quality is very good
Display quality is very good  4 out of 5 
The sound was the best I have heard in a mobile phone.
4  The camera quality is good in fact very good for a 10k mobile and the interface and speed is really impressive.
Sound quality is pain to ear drums after some tracks.
Good quality picture   sound   Rear camera picture very good .
5 Good Sound 
n camera quality so good.
board Dolby ATMOS sound system really does a phenomenal job with some good quality ear.
Sound quality is pretty decent with dolby 
Looks  feel  touch  sound output are super.
Build quality is very good
get a tempered glass of good quality  
7  sound quality and loudness 
3  Sound quality is good.
But Pic quality is good as usual but who cares if it doesn t support for more that 1 hour  Since battery drains quickly 
13 MP rare and 5MP front camera with good Quality .
Regarding Usage its good till now  Display is awesome  camera quality is good for Primary Camera  slim design  light weight  dual micro sim set  sound is good.
sound quality is awesome with dolby atmos.
No android update till date  camera is not as good as 13 mpx Samsung  Gionee  Xiaomi  many times become unresponsive  overall an okay phone  the best thing is its call quality.
Voice quality is very good and very good network reception
While phone feature is good  camera is also decent  sound is good.
this phone is is not good bcz its camera and mp3 sound is very bad so plz dont purchaz this phone any body 
with 401 PPI display quality is very good   if you frequently see video on net this phone is best for its price   thought it need some improvement when you use this phone in direct sunlight as color got faded.
Sound Quality is nice  Both Speaker and earphones 
Camera quality is good as per budget but if we compare to Samsung Galaxy S4 S5 or MI 4I  then it lacks in various terms 
1. camera quality is good.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad display  -23
display is quiet good .
As a result  the display is sharp and vid with excellent viewing angles.
Design is regular not attractive  also FULL HD display is equivalent to HD only.
display is definitely inferior to samsung.
 i have never liked android phones or used any of them and since i am an iphone user  this is my first lenovo phone and i must say im impressed with the phone at such a low price  excellent UI  the camera is brilliant  the full hd display makes everything look soo much better  i would recommend this phone to everyone.
  a neat and sharp display with scratch resistance
The 1080p FHD display is quite impressive  even though the colors are not brilliantly crisp but that won t be much a trouble as for daily use  the screen performs really really impressive.
Looking for DSLR quality pics  Go ahead and buy a DSLR and not a phone  The display is sturdy enough even though there is no gorilla glass.
Not great but still good considering the fact that it has to drive full hd display.
The display is amazingly good  with rich but not oversaturated colours.
Looks good on the retina display  not good enough for editing.
Display is good but not gorilla glass
Guys i got my lenovo k3 note its dam good and prety yar some reviews maid battery worst and display till now my battery is working min 32 hrs without charge continuous wifi and display is dam good 
Good points are already been mentioned such as display audio quality performance.
Using this half day came this much to note don t know whats ahead Display is awesome 
5. display is good but not gorilaa glass.
The full HD display is too good.
5 inch screen and 2900 mah battery  yes not 3000   with a great display  including the screen to body ratio.
10 minutes playing game Or watching movie use data etc phone getting hot display vary hot.
7. full hd display u cant get it any device at this range
Display sluggish.good display  100
3  Display was good 
5 Inch full HD display is really good.
Display is OK
Display  Very good.
i like the display quality is awesome with full hd but it lacks gorilla glass protection.
display is excellent  
It have great display and battery is also good.
1. best display and can be compared to any higher end mobiles
5inch full HD display at a jaw dropping price tag of Rs.
 Good Display 
This k3 note display have smaller loosly packed pixels and one can easily see those if tried to.
1. looks really stylish  display is really good
Yes  sound is good  display is good.
awesome HD display
Amazing Display size and Display  Full HD videos are playing flawlessly without any stutter or lag.
If peoples like me who luks for beautiful display  stylish design   light weight   gud performance without any lag u can buy k3 blindly.
1  Large Display and Clarity
Beautiful display especially when you play high HD videos  it easily leaves most of the phone behind in this category with a very smooth touch.
Good camera excellent full hd display.
Display is mindblowingly awesome.
Overall its a great phone with awesome display  great performance at amazing price   
Fantastic Display
5 good Display
Selfie cam lags a bit but display is ok for 5mp
Full hd great display
Two stars for fab display and Dolby atmos.
Smooth touch and excellent display.
Good display  vibrant colors  good viewing angles
Good Display
First have to say the display is great and smooth touch response.
Large display with brilliant color reproduction
very excellent display
2  Display  Amazing  It s so good that you would love watching videos and playing games on it.
Excellent Display
Display is nice.
fantastic display.
Excellent display
1. very good display
Amazing Display 
Camera will disappoint many who loves photography and the cheap display will one day come up with dead pixels and odd color tones which lenovo wont cover in warranty obviously.
I feel the display is very good and the definition is good and sharp.
for 10k full hd display octacore processor 13mp rear and 5mp front cam this phone out class all other smartphones in its price range.
1. display is good
DISPLAY IS VERY GOOD.
Those who like larger mobile screens will love Lenovo as it gives full HD display.
camera  display  touch  front camera etc are amazing.
1  The display is just WOW being full hd with 441ppi.
5 inch Full HD display is really awesome.
Display is very clear and attractive.
Its a social media cam for the cheapest possible full hd display smartphone.
Display  the display is crisp and vid  its accurate and the colour reproduction is accurate.
Display is crisp and decent under sunlight Very good graphics   sharp and highly responsive.
Display is good.
BATTERY average  It has got 3000 mah battery   it lasts only for one day with normal use because it is full hd display and uses a 8 core processor it make the battery drain quickly as compared to other 3000 mah phones.
7 ghz proccessor and full hd display
full hd crisp display  pixel control is awesome  Viewing angle very good.
Great Display  full HD display
3. a bright crisp and beautiful display
5. inch IPS HD  1080x1920p  display is impressive with vibrant colours and has a good touch response.
You can buy the phone for the awesome display alone.
5 inch Display is Good 
Excellent Display 
5 inches with nice display   battery back up is good 
Good Design and IPS display was good.
Best display for any device under 10k.
Display is crisp 
1  Display  I didn t expect the display to be good.
The full HD display is better than 720p of Moto G3.
2  HD Display great
Phone gets heated very badly after using 3g for an hour and heats on the upper portion nearby the front can and proximity sensor and the whole side even the whole display gets heated that u can t use the cell for voice call after.
1080p Display that is just perfect and mindblowing for watching HD movies  playing games.
Display is good and camera also fine.
it seems good in HD display.
2  The main attraction of the phone  the FHD display  is vibrant and beautiful as expected.
large display  
fair display
5  large Display of the phone is Awesome 
Thanks to full HD display with 401 PPI watching images and videos is a pleasure  though white looks a bit pale but one can ignore that considering the price tag.
My HTC phone  with HD display and little lower specs  has a much better user experience than this Lenovo K3 Note Full HD display   
5  full hd display.
3  The display is awesome and there was no issue with it.
the display is brilliant but the battery is very poor and lot of heating problem.
great display  
the display is just superb and the slick design attract the eye .
Display is awesome and the phone is very fast.
Fabulous Display   Audio and Video Quality are Wonderful.
3  display is good enough
display is quiet good .
coz the phone contains a full hd display and a large processor.
--------------------------------------------------------
worst battery  -22
 Lenovo k3 note is ossum phone in this 10k I also see the review and think that I don t buy this phone and I want to cancel my order but I take patience and my phone is come and its too good to use no problem found in this phone battery life is good and also camera result is too good.
As I said when I surf 3g for 10 mins the battery drains very fast and at the same time the phone starts to overheat.
Excellent battery life for moderate to heave use  calls  surfing youtube  whatsapp .
Battery life is poor.
good battery life good design good speakers attractive price ONLY PROBLEM IS IT DOES NOT HAVE GORILLA GLASS PROTECTION .
every thing is ok  camera is not nice battery packup is worst honor 4x is better than this lenovo dont take this is not a good mobile take any other company mobiles dont take this mobile 
Touch screen is OK. 5. battery backup is not that good  more is expected from 2900 MaH battery.
It Never Leg   Nice Camera Quality Gives HD Images   And Performance is little Slow Because Of Its Processor But Nice Phone   Battery Is Good Its Gives U 24 Hour To Used It If You Are Playing Hard Games Like Call OF Duty And All Its Gives You 5 Hour Its NIce By The Way .
well i would say 2 days is not enough but using both sims and wifi always on  i am seeing battery life is not that great.
It has an Amazing Battery Capacity of 2900 mAh they said it will be 3000 mAh whisch was a false advertising  which never make your drain earlier.
using since month and a good phone found in long run with adequate battery life.
Battery Backup is good but not upto the expectation level for a battery of 2900mAh  it is still better than Samsung phones  
Below average Battery life Especially when Data is enabled
but battery was good  not bad .
Overall feel of the phone is good  FHD screen really works fine  battery back up is good  i am a heavy user of photo editing apps and this phone takes it all  initially i faced some lagging whilst multi tasking however its not there anymore and it works fine  13mp rear and 5mp front shooter works pretty decent especially during day light it gives very rich photos  overall  a great phone at this price.
2. battery life too good same as MI.
good battery lasts nearly 5hrs continuous using 
Besides all the SAR thing that is dangerous to health  as mentioned by  JAYAKRISHNAN K J  in his review  the 2900 mah battery also seems to be weak.
The battery drains off so fast  I could get the back up for only 12 hours after 100  charge.
3  battery backup is not great it is normal.
Battery life is average.
I really don t understand  the company promises of long battery life atleast for 1 full day and which is something worst.nice battery  87
The overall specifications of the mobile are awesome  amazingly light well  battery is good  built quality is good  need to purchase a protective case for rough handlers  screen and visualizations  speed is good.
The processor works fine  Battery is decent  Touch is good  Light weight.
Battery backup is very good.
Battery backup is good but takes arround 2.
3000mAh Battery that much of good.
good battery backup.
its decent but i would say that i am getting much higher battery life on my oneplus and when playing games  it does heat up a bit.
2  Good Battery backup
battery backup is good too.
if the battery had a better life it would have been the best phone to buy.
The phone is sleek and having a good battery life.
Battery Backup is good  But with being DUAL SIM active  WiFi  Browsing  Playing Games  and Opening Multiple Tasks then the Rate of Discharge is increased.
Battery  It sports a very good 3000mAh battery.
Charges quickly and good battery back up of beyond 24hours with active wifi or mobile data use all the time.
Excellent battery life for moderate to heave use  calls  surfing youtube  whatsapp .
Good Battery Backup
I expected good battery life seeing reviews online and being this is an MTK Chipset thean qual comm
Good battery backup  On average usage it s giving more than 24hrs 
The smartphone s software does not seem to be optimized  as I have seen smartphones with smaller battery capacities deliver more battery life despite higher resolution displays  for example  Samsung Galaxy S6 .
1  Amazing battery life of 1.
For that we really need a good battery backup phone.
This phone is worth of its price and is very good  but battery back up is the problem only for those who continuously will be on call.
It have great display and battery is also good.
1  Good battery life without internet easily upto 36hrs and with internet 24 hrs
3000mAh battery not sufficient for the phone  battery drains fast.
  a decent battery life
Whether the battery has a good backup.
GREAT Battery Backup  10 to 12 hrs Moderate Uses  Love s Standby Time upto 3   half days on 3G
Battery back up is also very good.
Battery drains very fast and too much heating.
2. battery life too good same as MI.
 Good battery withstand capacity.
Good Battery Life.
but battery was good  not bad .
Battery life also good.
Battery back up is good.
Good battery life
Battery is very good  I have been using Data Connection WiFi and Voice calls but it last long for more than 1.
First the battery life  after a heavy to moderate use the battery has lasted for 15 hours with still 5  remaing and I am pretty sure I can stretch this for another hour or so.
Light weight  sensitive touch  nice camera and decent battery backup is what is required from a good smartphone.
good battery lasts nearly 5hrs continuous using 
Battery backup is good.
Battery is good last a day easily.
Good battery Backup .
This phone is equiped with a 2900mAh removable battery and it lasts for 2.
5 inches with nice display   battery back up is good 
Battery life is good enough for couple of days of regular usage and playing games and watching some videos.
4 Good Battery life.
So  the battery backup is good.
Battery backup is so good.
Good Battery back.
5 inch screen  music quality is good  battery back up average but can last very long if kept on stand buy
I excpected a lot with the battery of this phone  but i am really disappointed with its backup  i also have Lenovo A6000 plus which gives a very good Battery Backup  but this one is really laging behind  i am a moderate user and it only lasts 10.
1  Good Battery life
Good battery backup.
All i wanted was good battery  display and music quality.
3 excellent battery backup  i use 24.
Battery life is good but it takes lot of time to recharge.
Battery is is good when you are using normally without using wify.
Good enough battery life for a phablet
3 good battery backup and optimization options
Lenovo name is missing in front   battery backup not so good  built quality is just ok   plastic look  no corning gorilla glass  not easy to fit in hand.
I recommend this phone who want good battery life  display  internet usage and music.
I would have given Four stars if Battery life was good 
BATTERY life is decent.
The battery seem to be good and it easily lasted over 1 day for average to heavy use.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad performance  -41
Battery performance is not good  Yes I purchased Lenovo k. 3 note from flipkart on 26th September  2015  other performance is satisfactory but it is bettery performance is not good.
 I GOT THIS PHONE YESTERDAY  PHONE LOOKS great very light weight  but camera quality is not good  performance wise its working fine  and sar value is very high 
camera performance is bit average but worth more than other below 15000k mobiles.
performance also not good 
Almost everyone seems to rate this phone the day they get it  Why no reviews after using for a cpl of months  which would be a better indicator of real performance 
Regarding performance its good but not excellent  tested with almost 80 apps installed including built in.
I am really worried of the mobile performance.
Pros     Overall display   camera performance is too good.
3 star one for the phone of overall performance average camera average battery everythng is average and zero star for the flipkart for their worstest service and return policy.
The phone is working flawless without any issues and really you will feel the premium look and full satisfaction as per overall performance.
I have used it and performance is good only problem is service center I could not find.
Also camera performance is not good.
7Ghz Octacore processors seems to have decent specs on paper  But performance is not so impressive.
We also get an option of uninstalling pre installed apps which is great  Performance is awesome  apps open close quickly without lagging  games are smooth too.
From the above  it is evident that the Smarphone performance is not that good.
Battery performance is average.
Very good and handy mobile  but battery backup and performance is very low.
Pathetic performance.
Don t buy this product if you are looking for a genuine performance driven mobile.
Battery performance is average  only coming for 1 day in power saving mode when i play games for 1.
Camera is good  but in low light it gives average performance 
Such a pathetic performance that is is delayed for a couple of seconds even to open a saved contact.
Overall performance is quite smooth and good an heavy multitasking and screen is quite sharp.
Smooth  lag free performance
So totally awesome performance and hence it is a killer note.
Don t use some expensive device and then expect the same performance from this.
Rating  Overall camera performance is average
its overall performance is very good and it give more battery backup   display is good   touch is good and sound quality is better with Dolby sound system .
Software and performance is average.
Phone camera battery backup and Performance is not satisfactory.
Performance is very poor and it is lagging all the time.
The performance is decent with a minor lag sometimes and that too when I have multiple apps open in the background.
Now comes to the performance of mobile  I am using this mobile from last couple of days and felt like why i bought this because this mobile is hanging very much like if we play any app on it in the mean while if you open another app than it is working very slowly and if you click on the back button than it keeps on the same page for some time after that its going back.
performance is awazem.
Camera Quality is also good but not a great performance.
But unfortunately performance is below expectation.
Battery performance is poor.great performance  56
Battery performance is not good  Yes I purchased Lenovo k. 3 note from flipkart on 26th September  2015  other performance is satisfactory but it is bettery performance is not good.
Good performance
While benchmark is a marketing story  the real life performance also seemed pretty awesome .
Performance is fantastic no lag till now and it was super speed
If i talk about the overall performance of this phone  i can say  its not very good.
this processor runs fast   smooth performance.
if u want a gud camera it k3 cant be your choice but if luk for performance  display etc nothing can beat k3 in this range thats for sure so far.
6  Game performance is better than Mi4i 
Nice Performance while playing Casual and Mid.
I am really worried of the mobile performance.
the software and playing game performance is nice no heating problem  light weight nice specifications.
cameras  13MP  performance is decent.
Good performance Good camera quality Good battery 
No heating problems and good performance.
Even though K3 has some bloatware  its never too intrusive or performance degrading.
 Amazing performance for under 10k.
The display  camera quality  battery backup and audio performance is quite good with the phone.
We also get an option of uninstalling pre installed apps which is great  Performance is awesome  apps open close quickly without lagging  games are smooth too.
when comes to battery phone is a disaster   dont go for this phone if you are moderate to high usage user   especially in 4G  though it did moderate performance when I use only 2G with very less use of phone.
So if you really want some good performance from this phone close unused running application and then use it.
So far my phone s performance is wonderful  no heating problems what so ever and no lag.
Great Performance with a 1.
1 update for better performance.
Don t buy this product if you are looking for a genuine performance driven mobile.
Performance is far better than my 21k galaxy grand which was a complete chaos and that is why i changed to K3 now .
I wanted a large screen with enough memory and decent performance.
Snapdragon processor might have been a good choice for better performance during multiple apps installed.
Good in performance 
1  excellent performance .
Overall performance is quite smooth and good an heavy multitasking and screen is quite sharp.
1. best in performance  no lag what so ever  frequently clear the RAM  dnt use any app to clean the RAM use inbuild one 
Phone performance is really good.
Performance is super.
Great phone with good camera good performance good UI awesome sound quality no lags or hangs a acceptable baery performance.
its overall performance is very good and it give more battery backup   display is good   touch is good and sound quality is better with Dolby sound system .
It has 13MP rear and 5MP front camera  both camera did good performance  don t expect flagship like picture  I have used Mi4i as well for some days and believe me it did good performance from Mi4i  front camera snap good picture as it has beauty option enabled .
Can t say much about it s performance as didn t get the chance to use it.
For GAMING  the performance is decent as well.
good performance  battery life and speed.
Excellent performance.
Stable performance.
Phone is good with great performance.
My Antu performance is 43653  which is very good.
awesome performance.
MOTO G is much better performance wise.
 After using this phone for about a week  I am really very happy with it s performance.
Note  After the latest marshmallow update performance is way better.
Speed and performance is great  downloaded the upgrades within few seconds after receiving it and phone was ready to use next minute.
Better performance than any Samsung Mobile 
5. camera performance is awesome however low light pictures are avg
12. gaming performance is good but high graphics games lags some time
--------------------------------------------------------
worst mobile  -29
if you use this as primary device and take lot of calls  be safe and get something else as it has very high SAR value which you should take note of.
the device is very good but not the perfect device as it could have been.
I am truly requesting to all please look out for any other device.
The device does not feel luxurious nor very cheap  but it is well made.
 Multiple options for power management make the device usable even in low.
So go for any other device which will certainly give you a satisfaction of using a phone.
Overall its a great device at 9999  highly recommend one to purchase it 
Overall this device lives upto expectations.
I called Flipkart service and asked for return and exchange me with new device that is in good condition.
If you compare with other device of same feature it doesn t get heated 
both of the above score beats any other device at this price.
Trust me this device is not bad however it s also not so great 
Friends  these are the genuine issues which I am facing  I have purchased 3 LENOVO k3 NOTE and having the same issues in all of them  so I am sure the issues with the all the device not with the particular device.
Yes it s getting warm after some use  and produce some more heat during gaming or doing heavy task near camera but  device is managable.
battery is not upto mark but we cant blame the phone 2900mmh with hd display it will dry soon  with some gaming  surfing  movies   music 8hr and you need to charge it again for me it great device in this range the best.
3  The device is smooth and lag free  I haven t faced any software issues till now.
I have been using this Device since a month  I have updated my device to latest 322 mb update.
It will lag  the device sometimes gets slow.
The proximity sensor is also behaving weired when the device is over heated and makes screen blank even if the phone is not at ear.
Gaming is very weak on this Device.
Device is not good.
and this is review for Lenovo K3 NOTE so it is amazing device SO don t think MORE   buy it without Confusion.
The device is extremely lightweight and easy to hold in one hand.
In 10k this is the best device in the market with the specs offered that too by a known brand like Lenovo.
In fact I have installed only 11 extra apps in my device other than the inbuilt apps.
Finally sar rating of this device is higher then other device in market but i say its in limit n its not higher then the indian standard sar limit.
overall this phone is an avereage device.
Camera is good in nicely lit areas but low light photography on this device is not really good.awesome mobile  32
1  Looks  It s a beautiful device.
I replaced this device due to heating issue but the issue is still remain after replacement.
Hence I say  overall this is a great device at a price  9999 INR.
All in all Lenovo offers a great device for a small sum of money.
The device does not feel luxurious nor very cheap  but it is well made.
Pretty happy with it  nice to use and feature rich device but there is a problem with its High SAR value but I use the earphones mostly so it s ok for me.
 Multiple options for power management make the device usable even in low.
 This is a wonderful device and as mentioned a KILLER one.
Overall its a great device at 9999  highly recommend one to purchase it 
Asphalt 8 should be playing at high setting on this device but I don t know why it lagged when i play for more than 3 minutes on high settings.
The maximum brightness of my device looks good and it can keep up with the competion.
2gb which is enough for this device.
Trust me this device is not bad however it s also not so great 
3  The device is smooth and lag free  I haven t faced any software issues till now.
i buy lenovo k3 note and i am facing problem that my device not show any wifi network and i replaced it and i got new device but in new device same problem is here bad phone   
opening device for the other giant mobile companies who sell their inferiorly configured  as compared to Lenovo K3 Note  mobiles for Rs.
59 SAR rated device are not at all harmful unless they are really long.
As a smartphone photographer the device is very good but in low light a bit crappy but adjustable.
Hopefully there s no heating issue for this device in future.
Don t use some expensive device and then expect the same performance from this.
Dont know if this is a generic issue or I have a defective device.
as many of the reviewers have stated before me how great the device is.
In built themes options to help you change the look and feel of your mobile device.
The device is good but the battery back up is very poor  it takes 4 hours to completely charged and within 3 hours the battery is drained out completely with normal usage in 3G.
To be honest I expected it to be  46 000 but in my device it showed  39 000 First thing I did after switcing on the phone .
The device is extremely lightweight and easy to hold in one hand.
The EVERYDAY DAY USAGE of this device is just great.
Its indeed a great device.
P. S Don t trust Flipkart s 30 days exchange policy  This is just a misleading statement as I tried returning my device and first they ignored it and then they just refused it by saying that the temp in my device is normal.
Finally sar rating of this device is higher then other device in market but i say its in limit n its not higher then the indian standard sar limit.
An amazing device from a reputed brand.
--------------------------------------------------------
speed  27
The overall specifications of the mobile are awesome  amazingly light well  battery is good  built quality is good  need to purchase a protective case for rough handlers  screen and visualizations  speed is good.
While using internet on this mobile bit giving heat but never hang  Speed is good multi tasking  Battery back up is good  Dolby sound system Etc.
it show lowest speed in the segment and model no show lenovok50a40.
2  speed is superb
 Octa Core Processes but worse speed every time it will hang 
A53  MediaTek MT6752 64. bit 4G LTE  Octa Core Processor  for normal usage this is fine but when you do so much multitasking this phone stuck too much   if you used whatsapp so much always close some running application otherwise keyboard will not be responsive too much which will affect your typing speed.
both camera is not clarity  net speed is very poor this all is negative points and only one positive side is good looking .
Speed is good for multitasking
4g works really well   super speed but don t have benchmark to compare
4  The camera quality is good in fact very good for a 10k mobile and the interface and speed is really impressive.
Performance   In terms of Speed multitasking is no big a deal as Processing speed is good with smooth multitasking because of 1.
Some times I feel like it will move when my fan is in full speed  
4 speedy for rough use i use my phone at high speed to switch through different tasks 
Great hd display with great speed coz of 2gb RAM also great camera .
the speed is also awesome.
The phone works really well with good speed of RAM and processor.
speed is nice.
4g connectivity is working fine getting speed of almost 20mbps.
Processing speed is awesome.
Speed is good and little bit laggy at rare cases.
Good Speed.
I expected better speed.
 It downloading speed is fantastic and net surffing and gaming is outstanding 
High speed.
Lenovo Speed is so good  and there is no hanging problem in the phone. 
Speed is also good.
Speed is decent.
second speed.
Performance is fantastic no lag till now and it was super speed
two sim card are 4g but 3g speed is very good.
Poorest possible speed  huge lagging  enormous number of hangs  not even half a days battery life  all together makes this phone a complete shit to just throw away.
Charging speed is good.
--------------------------------------------------------
heating issue  -23
Kindly let me know in case anyone else is also facing the same heating issue and is there any solution to this  Please let me know at the earliest.
 This mobile problem is left side touch is not operate and heating problem and hanging problem.
Amazingly fast  no heating issue  battery backup is more than 12.
4 days  I noticed that it has a major heating issue.
There is no heavy heating issue but very slight bak panel is heating but compare to sony xperia M dual this heating issue is far far better.
Simply awesome with no lags or hangs and no excessive heating issues or system   app crashes so far.
And heating is too much a bigger issue as i complaint to flipkart and they refused to return it they said seller has refused your return request i told that i am not expecting my money back but i will not continue to this phone but Flipkart Support Sir we are not able to return or replace we will check the phone with Smartchek kindly check and let us know if still problem exist i called and tell them the problem is still there but no appropriate reply they only just said we cant return it .
There is no such heating problem and camera issues.
Today ireceived my lenovo phone from flipkart  really its good phone till now i didnt faced any heating issue  touch response awesome.
I was very much concerned about the heating issue  biggest negative comment subject in reviews   but its not there in my set as of now.
Gaming goes well without lag like subway surfer but when its comes to online gaming or highend games like modern combat 5 it lags which is quite annoying no heating issues.
 using more then 20 days no heating issue best camera and speed looks awsm full hd video and Dolby what more u expect in 9999  dont hear who say its bad its awsm and no one can beat 
Very important issue is it s heating problem  Whenever i charge or use 3G data it starts heating abrubtly and temp reaches upto 48 C. This is weird.
Still not experienced heating issue as on date.
Severe heating problem  
As some users pointed out there is a heating issue sometimes  but not like some saying that it reaches 40  45 degrees.
No excessive heating issues or system   app crashes so far.
Heating is a major issue  you can not touch to your ears  it heats up near speaker  front .
Have not faced any over heating issue till now
--------------------------------------------------------
heating issue  -23
Kindly let me know in case anyone else is also facing the same heating issue and is there any solution to this  Please let me know at the earliest.
 This mobile problem is left side touch is not operate and heating problem and hanging problem.
Amazingly fast  no heating issue  battery backup is more than 12.
There is no heavy heating issue but very slight bak panel is heating but compare to sony xperia M dual this heating issue is far far better.
Simply awesome with no lags or hangs and no excessive heating issues or system   app crashes so far.
And heating is too much a bigger issue as i complaint to flipkart and they refused to return it they said seller has refused your return request i told that i am not expecting my money back but i will not continue to this phone but Flipkart Support Sir we are not able to return or replace we will check the phone with Smartchek kindly check and let us know if still problem exist i called and tell them the problem is still there but no appropriate reply they only just said we cant return it .
Today ireceived my lenovo phone from flipkart  really its good phone till now i didnt faced any heating issue  touch response awesome.
 using more then 20 days no heating issue best camera and speed looks awsm full hd video and Dolby what more u expect in 9999  dont hear who say its bad its awsm and no one can beat 
I was very much concerned about the heating issue  biggest negative comment subject in reviews   but its not there in my set as of now.
Gaming goes well without lag like subway surfer but when its comes to online gaming or highend games like modern combat 5 it lags which is quite annoying no heating issues.
4 days  I noticed that it has a major heating issue.
Very important issue is it s heating problem  Whenever i charge or use 3G data it starts heating abrubtly and temp reaches upto 48 C. This is weird.
No excessive heating issues or system   app crashes so far.
Have not faced any over heating issue till now
Severe heating problem  
There is no such heating problem and camera issues.
As some users pointed out there is a heating issue sometimes  but not like some saying that it reaches 40  45 degrees.
Heating is a major issue  you can not touch to your ears  it heats up near speaker  front .
Still not experienced heating issue as on date.no heating  21
It has major heating issue.
I don t experience any heating issue.
the phone is good but i am facing problem in  MENU  HOME AND BACK BUTTON   IN NIGHT I AM NOT ABLE TO SEE ALL THIS 3 BUTTON the light of this button is not working also there is heating problem in this phone and also there is very fem setting available in camera option 
this phone a major problem heating problem.
5  Hardly played any games but observed heating issue while palying 
This phone has so much heating problem.
There is no heavy heating issue but very slight bak panel is heating but compare to sony xperia M dual this heating issue is far far better.
No heating issue.
HEATING  I haven t find any heating issue .
No heating issue at all.
Over all worst heating issues and i cant even use this phone for ten minutes.
there is no any heating issue in this device.
l found littlebit heating issue while using wifi and on call  as I am using from 15th June  but less compared to other products
It also have some heating issue while making call and launching light applications.
there is no major heating problem.
4 heating issue
1  Initially some heating issue.
Totally phone is useless without battery backup and over heating issue.
Yes while palying games also there is some heating issue for demanding games  so do other phones have the issue.
Regarding biggest negative issue mentioned in other comments   I have not faced any issue of heating as of now.
--------------------------------------------------------
full hd screen  19
The colours are more or less accurate and not washed out and full HD screen is always a treat.
 i have never liked android phones or used any of them and since i am an iphone user  this is my first lenovo phone and i must say im impressed with the phone at such a low price  excellent UI  the camera is brilliant  the full hd display makes everything look soo much better  i would recommend this phone to everyone.
it drains so fast because of the full HD screen i suppose.
full HD .
1  The display is just WOW being full hd with 441ppi.
i like the display quality is awesome with full hd but it lacks gorilla glass protection.
 full hd quality.
 using more then 20 days no heating issue best camera and speed looks awsm full hd video and Dolby what more u expect in 9999  dont hear who say its bad its awsm and no one can beat 
Full hd great display
Its a social media cam for the cheapest possible full hd display smartphone.
it is not full HD.
Thanks to full HD display with 401 PPI watching images and videos is a pleasure  though white looks a bit pale but one can ignore that considering the price tag.
2. video quality is nice full hd screen 
be it full hd screen.
5  full hd display.
5 inches screen which is very beautiful with excellent viewing angles  Its a treat to watch movies on the Full HD display  totally impressed  10 10 
overall good mobile under 10k with full hd.
5 inch full HD phones.
5inch full HD display at a jaw dropping price tag of Rs.
7 ghz proccessor and full hd display
The full HD display is better than 720p of Moto G3.
Great phone  slim  sleek  White  Fast  camera is good  Full HD colors are beautiful  best phone by far.
BATTERY average  It has got 3000 mah battery   it lasts only for one day with normal use because it is full hd display and uses a 8 core processor it make the battery drain quickly as compared to other 3000 mah phones.
Not great but still good considering the fact that it has to drive full hd display.
Design is regular not attractive  also FULL HD display is equivalent to HD only.
The full HD display is too good.
7. full hd display u cant get it any device at this range
full hd crisp display  pixel control is awesome  Viewing angle very good.
Good camera excellent full hd display.
coz the phone contains a full hd display and a large processor.
the full hd screen does its job .
it also supports otg and full hd movies look very nice in the 5.
for 10k full hd display octacore processor 13mp rear and 5mp front cam this phone out class all other smartphones in its price range.
they say its a full HD   its a cheap panel.
Those who like larger mobile screens will love Lenovo as it gives full HD display.
--------------------------------------------------------
looks  17
Good Looks.
Build quality is excellent and has premium stylish looks.
2GB ram looks useless with a poor mediatek processor.
Looks good on the retina display  not good enough for editing.
1  Display  Amazing  Looks good.
VIBE UI is very boring and limits myself  hence i have downloaded Cobo Launcher which is really great and phone looks lot better and beautiful.
Looks are great very light and stylish.
Stylish looks  beautiful display  light weight  killer performance 
looks so perfect in the hand and feels like having costly phone in hand.
trendy looks 
 I GOT THIS PHONE YESTERDAY  PHONE LOOKS great very light weight  but camera quality is not good  performance wise its working fine  and sar value is very high 
looks very stylish.
It is feather weight and looks are pretty  beautiful  gorgeous and all the synonyms of the same.
I would definitely not say looks cheap.
Now what else u want from K3 note its a damn cool phone with sexy looks with high end specification and HD display in Rs.
1. superb looks.
Quite good and impressive looks 15.
looks are good
Looks good
Looks  good Slim.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad quality  -5
Build and form factor  Slim  light in weight and visually feels good in hand though not of very great build quality as compared to the competing leaders in the same segment.
UPDATES   I am taking a star off due to it s poor build quality.
I thought may be the looks and build quality are bad but the performance might be great but i was disappointed in the performance also.
Build quality not the best.
Build quality is ok as it has got the plastic body  performance looks excellent  FHD screen rocks for videos and games though games are yet to be tested  DOLBY ATMOS speakers are super hit and sounds top notch.good quality  15
Build quality is excellent and has premium stylish looks.
Using this phone since last 15 days  no lag issues  battery backup is very good  camera is good  build quality is best  light weight  feels good in hand  display is the real killer.
menu key and back key are not working its build quality is so poor
Build quality is decent for price range.
Good Build Quality .
Build quality of the phone also was not upto the mark  main reason was the back cover felt like a low quality plastic and the home and volume buttons are attached on it gives a low quality design feel.
Build quality is premium slim low wait
Build quality is very good.
8  Build quality is decent but the device feels very light.
Good build quality
Solid build quality.
Coming to BUILD quality  I must say that it is amazing.
Because of excellent Build quality of Moto G3   it is better here.
Build quality is very good
Extremely light weight and good build quality  but back panel is very slippery.
--------------------------------------------------------
high sar value  15
The heating problem worsens if the network signal is poor   95dBm or high   SAR is  1.
if need one more negative to be stated is that its SAR value is 1.
A very high SAR value.
I think there is nothing to worry about high SAR values and yet I have not found any problem so I am really happy with my set and also with flipkart service.
High SAR levels  radiation level .
Unlike other comments about this product there is no heating problem in my set during call and for information  given SAR value is maximum when we are using all frequency at a time i. e. having call while wi.
So  a lower SAR Value doesn t simply implies that the phone somehow safer than a phone with higher SAR Value.
High SAR value.
This is a big disadvantage considering its high SAR value of 1.
SAR value is very high
I wish to add one more thing Lenovo K3 note has the maximum SAR  radiation level  value of 1.
Many people are worried about the high SAR values of K3 Note.
After having Lenovo A7000 for quite some time  facing terrible heat issues with Lenovo A7000 and the high SAR value of Lenovo Note were on my top of my mind while confirming the order.
People might report about the SAR value but it makes no sense as even motorola have high sar value and people didnt had any problem till date.
All the features are good  but the worst thing is heating problem i cannot be able to speak for 3 min also    the SAR value is very high 
6 sar value but as we know this fact that k3 also have high value within the proposed limit we would feel some sort of detachment with the phone and its a brain game.
is it becoz of high SAR value.
 High SAR
Did anyone notice the high SAR head value   It is the highest value in the world among all phones.
High SAR value cause headache and not good for health.
As everyone knows  SAR Value was quite high.
high SAR value compared to others
the SAR is very high for the device and I have started feeling the heat
One con I found with K3 Note is the high SAR value  1.
even though it is the maximum value the actual SAR value will be well less than in use but when your phones signal strength is week it will dischare its highest radiation and make you sick very soon.
Its high SAR value is a serious problem too.
Both the device have high SAR.
6  though note that there are no proven effects of mobile based microwave radiation  a SAR value of around 40 and above is known to be harmful 
A single SAR value does not provide sufficient information about the amount of RF exposure under typical usage conditions to reliably compare individual cell phone models.
 I GOT THIS PHONE YESTERDAY  PHONE LOOKS great very light weight  but camera quality is not good  performance wise its working fine  and sar value is very high 
Alarmingly High SAR values  Head .
High SAR  1.
Hey everyone   few of you are worried about its SAR value which is 1.
 every thing is ok but phone gets heated up for 5 calls basically i dont get long minutes call and highest sar value 
I was worried about the SAR value which is quite higher than my old Xperia.
the maximum SAR value from a phone in India is limited by 1.
A well maintained battery of a high SAR rated phone would emit less radiation than a lower rated phone whose battery is regularly mishandled.
SAR value high
Bit worried about the rather high SAR value.
The SAR value is very high as per the govt of India permitted not good for health.
Secondly there is no scientific evidence of higher SAR causing Headache cancer.
59 is not always that value but its the maximum sar value for this phone at a low range area.
The phone seems to be fine and so are the features  only concern being the high SAR value.
SAR value is very very high so it produces more radiation and affect health 
High SAR values will cause health problems  Even on DoT website it is written that anything less than 1.
However  only the highest SAR values for each frequency band are included in the final authorization to demonstrate compliance with thee Federal Communications Commission s RF  Radio.
So far as SAR value is concerned  I am not competent to comment because it is a technical issue.
if you use this as primary device and take lot of calls  be safe and get something else as it has very high SAR value which you should take note of.
Was worried about high SAR value but that is still within permissible limit however the way it heats up in few mins of usage really looks dangerous.
High SAR value  avoid this phone who ever using the phone calling for long duration 
SAR is high and is noticeable during a call for more than 30 mins.
6 is the maximum sar value allowed and below that it is safe  k3 note 1.
SAR value is very high and heats up when u are talking
high sar value  ears are getting heated up and burning for just a 5 mins call.
As for the high SAR value.
But hey  even Iphone has a high SAR value.
American scale always gives higher SAR values.
--------------------------------------------------------
lenovo service center  -13
Flipkart delivered a LENOVO mobile K3 Note   but no where mentione about K  noe in mobile  in adds mentioned that battery capacity is 30000mAH  nut I received only 2900mAH capacity.
so only i bought the lenovo again.
last not the least why didnt lenovo send head set speakers with the mobile.
off Lenovo for such an amazing designed phone.
I ordered and got new Lenovo K3 Note.
13. updates by lenovo is too frequent and that is a good thing
Just pray that nothing goes wrong with the handset because there are better chances of a camel passing through the eye of a needle than Lenovo Customer care taking care of your problems or even acknowledging that you exist  
I am surprised that Lenovo is providing such poor quality products and flipkart backing them up.
i come to know Lenovo doesn t offer Headsets which needs to be there.
Flipkart provide mobile Lenovo Motorola  Huawei etc are 1.
I need to charge it twice a day  which is very disappointing   Lenovo need to work more on battery side.
Lots of functions This can be included in the next update Lenovo.
there is no handsfree given by Lenovo with this product.
Service  There seems to be few authorised Lenovo service centres in Chennai.
The service is also really bad  Lenovo  .
 dear lenovo compamy you gays keep contact with other online services flipkart not going to reach your bench mark selling  
5 VGA if such worst quality products are sold by flipkart i think flipkart and Lenovo should count down there lastday.
Even Lenovo has good no of service centres in each city in India.
 i have never liked android phones or used any of them and since i am an iphone user  this is my first lenovo phone and i must say im impressed with the phone at such a low price  excellent UI  the camera is brilliant  the full hd display makes everything look soo much better  i would recommend this phone to everyone.
Lenovo K3 Note doesn t look much different from other Lenovo Android phones.
few days back i received my most awaited Lenovo K3.
Overall  The new Lenovo K3 is worth Money with all its features and smooth Android running with loads of apps and games   Definitely worth Money.
on the whole lenovo had done a great job and its excellency should be experienced for sure.
Please be aware  Lenovo  Xiaomi are giving features   low prices  but not of the superior standards.
Third class phone worst touch screen i am very dissatisfy with service center bcoz last 1 month my mobile don t give back from customer service center so i suggest all of you don t buy any product of lenovo 
Usually I heard good responses for lenovo phones so i purchased my first Lenovo Phone but my expedition regarding the product was not very much pleasing after using it.
The features are so good that Lenovo could even put the tag of minimum 15 000 
As of now gaming is weak but hoping Lenovo improves this by a software update.
 i have received new Lenovo k3note against my order no.
Radiation range is very high Lenovo mentioned the user manual also .
OVERALL   LENOVO K3 IS A GOOD PHONE AND I RECOMMEND IT TO YOU GUYZ .
Lenovo is new for cellphones but its there in IT sector from years.
overall lenovo k3 note is a better ph till now 
I have heard the after sales service of Lenovo is good  so that will be a relief if something bad happens.
And also  no where i ve seen this Product as  Lenovo K3 Note  except on the BOX and while i ve connected this phone to my laptop  my lappy identified this mobile as Lenovo A7000.
the heating issue which happens in Lenovo A6000  is because of this micro sd card so this trick will probably prevent the same in Lenovo K3 Note.
Note   Covers  screenguards or tempered glass of Lenovo a7000 fit perfectly with Lenovo k3 note since both devices have same dimensions.
10000  i am using this phone from 6 months  till now i am facing no problem very satisfied with this awesome lenovo k3 note.
Just second day i found that touch is not working properly  so i contacted flipkart to replace my instrument  they told me that Lenovo technical team will contact me  after one day i got a call from lenovo and they told me that they have checked in software via their smartcheck app and found my fone is ok and it has no problem  and they reject my return request  
free in this Lenovo smartphone.
Lenovo is better off manufacturing laptops.
Waiting For Lenovo K4 Note or Other Lenovo product.
So i requesting lenovo for add the head phone set with this box.
 Flipkart is not at all bothered for there customer satisfaction they are just abt to make money the phone i buyed from flipkart is not at all good LENOVO K3 NOTE its hanging a lot and also its dialer is not displaying we have complained about the same but flipkart is not bothered at all they just connected to technical team which is of no use and atlast they stated that they cant change or refund the amt or product.
6 Camera could be better but it is better than any other lenovo model
--------------------------------------------------------
a little bit  -10
Little bit heating but manageable on regular usage.
battery is ok. little bit heating issue is there.
It hangs a little bit.
 2  little bit of heating not much only when heavy gaming for long
Yes it heats a little bit while playing games   for me a max of 42 degree   but it is not as high as compared with other phones .
games app cause a little bit hang.
2900 mah battery is good bt it needs to be a little bit higher.
In daylight Both cameras are too good  in low light conditions a little bit of noise 
It heats a little bit.
Performance is smooth  multitasking is great  a little bit of lag in UI here and there  but GPU is just above average  Often  Subway surfers start lagging after playing for sometime.
Little bit hanging.
Getting a little bit heat while using for long.
 Phone is getting little bit heat when we talk more than 15min and also sometimes its getting hangged.
Night mode camera only little bit bad.
Speed is good and little bit laggy at rare cases.
Little bit laggy.
A little bit difficult in using connectivity features like Bluetooth   WiFi.
little bit heating issue  
The rear camera takes good pictures but with a little bit noise occasionally.
1  Little bit heating at long usage with games n surfing
And it doesn t drop frames while playing these games   a little bit in modern combat while shooting  nothing serious .
--------------------------------------------------------
days of usage  -9
2  The battery lasts for full day even after heavy usage gaming  and charges quickly.
my usage is minimum still the battery just last.
Battery backup drains faster than expected from 2900 battery on heavy usage it is decent but not upto the mark as expected from 2900 battery.
Though it is a 2900 mAh battery  on normal usage it would not last more than a day.
Doesn t last the whole day after heavy usage even on 2G.
Battery backup is also good  stands for 1 day with average usage.
I feel so embarrassed   how company like Lenovo is fooling customers by showing 2 GB RAM and only giving around 600Mb to 700Mb for practical usage 
it heats a lot in mild usage.
1  Little bit heating at long usage with games n surfing
heavy usage
Battery is fairly decent but will give a full day with moderate usage  charging take over 3 hours.
Heating did vary as per the usage.
4 hours  and once its down to 35  then it will take just an hour of usage to be empty.
3 days of normal usage easily.
Since heat remains confined to top of the display  you don t feel discomfort on regular usage.
Good battery backup  On average usage it s giving more than 24hrs 
Though this are a little different from normal usage  the phones performance for apps and usage is also superb.
providing feedback on almost 20 days of effective usage.
Good Batery life 7 hrs of continous usage with 3g playing game music  Youtube browsing and watching 1080p videos .
Now come to heavy usage like playing Asphalt 8  Clash of Clans or other games you will notice that these application is lacking in performance and hangs a lot.
The RAM usage is more than usual  I am using the very basic apps like gmail  whats app  Music  and after these running application I am getting only 445 MB of free RAM out of 2 GB.
But with my usage i guarentee that there are no such issues.
Coming to battery it will last for 1 day on mixed usage and if 4g enabled then u got to charge twice in a day.
But overall  the phone will easily last you a full day with normal to even slightly heavy usage.
I get more than a full day with moderate usage.
The SAR Value is calculated based upon its maximum usage.
It releases ram from system memory if high usage Is required.
Other than that for normal usage  its battery lasts bit longer say 10 hours.
i have found some connectivity issues regarding Wifi usage but i am satisfied so far.
Battery depends upon usage and it works just fine for me   1.
battery is average on heavy usage it lasts 6 hours on continuous 3G and other gaming stuffs.
By high usage i mean 7.
16 hrs with 4G and full usage of music  games  videos etc.
3000mAh battery last for one full day with moderate usage of games   HD videos and calls.
14 hours on similar usage.
For full usage of all apps  the battery is lasting only for 5 to 6 hours.
Mu wife is using Moto G  3rd Gen  which heats to some notable extent while charging and extended usage.
1  Phone gets heated with less Usage like 5 mins talking to call.
Only con is that it heats a little on continuous usage.
5 days with medium usage on 2G 3G.
This review is after my one week usage and I hope it is good enough  
2900 MAh battery lasts for a day easily with average usage.
 Review after one day of heavy usage    
resolution screen  however  it seems the company did not increase the battery capacity sufficiently  as I could get barely one day of charge from the device even with moderate usage.
19 hours with heavy usage.
After 45 days of mobile usage I experienced some problem with the loud speaker of the phone which produces only noise so I handed over the phone on 26.
A53  MediaTek MT6752 64. bit 4G LTE  Octa Core Processor  for normal usage this is fine but when you do so much multitasking this phone stuck too much   if you used whatsapp so much always close some running application otherwise keyboard will not be responsive too much which will affect your typing speed.
Need to charge thrice a day for full usage.
I too checked it and after 10 minutes of usage its showing 300 mb free and started lagging .
con They take more ram Usage for inbuilt apps.
Battery  The device gets powered by a 2900 mAh battery  not 3000 mAh as Flipkart initially announced  which is very slim and lasts for more than a day with moderate to slightly heavy usage on WiFi and 3G.
Little bit heating but manageable on regular usage.
After few days of usage right side touch screen often doesn t work  approx 1.
battery lasts 1 day on average usage  from 9am to 9pm  
some time there is slight lags in common usage
If you are specific about gaming and camera  I would say avoid this phone but for general usage like me with casual games it is a fantastic value for money device at Rs.
6. camera good for daily usage.
Battery life is good enough for couple of days of regular usage and playing games and watching some videos.
Totally satisfied with Initial usage.
With medium usage  Wifi for about 10 hours  a little gaming asphalt  jumping tiles    it comes for a little more than a day.
Battery Life 14 hours on full brightness  3g connectivity and moderate call usage  net usage
--------------------------------------------------------
no heating issues  -9
free but no issues since everything is compensated by its amazing features.
But major issues observed are 
Worst phone  Just go to service center and you will find the number of users have the same issues.
But with my usage i guarentee that there are no such issues.
I bought 2 phone and have same issues with both phones 
Over all worst heating issues and i cant even use this phone for ten minutes.
Friends  these are the genuine issues which I am facing  I have purchased 3 LENOVO k3 NOTE and having the same issues in all of them  so I am sure the issues with the all the device not with the particular device.
There are lot more lacking and hanging issues with keyboard even I have tried many different keyboard but the same issues  I have used those keyboards in huawei Honor 4c and it working fine.
Facing call disconnect issues  not able to call sometime  getting hanged.
and  yes it does have some heating issues but they are minor and occasional.
But after an software update of 328mb all major issues where solved and now lenovo has certified that K3 note will get the android M update and the told that after the update it will solve the ram problem and free up space.
Other than the above mentioned Cons  I don t find any other issues as of now.
Started facing touch pad issues since last few days and took it to the service centre yesterday where I was told that there is an issue with the hardware and will need a replacement which would take 7 to 8 days.
Gaming goes well without lag like subway surfer but when its comes to online gaming or highend games like modern combat 5 it lags which is quite annoying no heating issues.
Major issues this days wid phones are hitting problem but this phone is not having such issues happy for that.
There is no such heating problem and camera issues.
No lag  stuck  hang issues.
Overall good product to use  no issues as such.
Request K3 Note buyers to please let me know in case anyone also has faced same issues like this or I have received the faulty piece  
Simply awesome with no lags or hangs and no excessive heating issues or system   app crashes so far.
No excessive heating issues or system   app crashes so far.
Similar issues faced by friends whom I only suggested in the initial one month 
All the best friends  please comment if you are also facing the same issues so that others did not make mistake.
The mobile has two major issues.
Secondly the Lenovo K3 Note phone is overall good  no issues and smooth functioning software s and applications.
--------------------------------------------------------
with k3 note  9
Finally got my hands on the most awaited k3 note.
also the back on K3 note is less rigid than one on A6000   
Excessive amounts of bloatware including 4 games  the Flipkart app  cheap move there  Flipkart  a navigation app whose name I ve forgotten since deleting it and a pretty useless note.
But the camera on K3 note is not bad at all  but it s not that good on some low light conditions.
I will buy Lenova k3 note last week 31.
This is  killer Note.
 lenove k3 note is really killer note but i got defected item.
Wished I would have bought Redmi 4G Note instead with 2K less and additional 1K with exchange.
Lenovo k3 note is just perfect of all the budget smartphones available in market today  JUST GOO FOR IT without any hesitation 
and today I received this excellent K3 noteThankyou Lenovo  
Compared to Lenovo A7000 s 720p display  the new K3 Note has a higher.
Design 10 10  Lenovo K3 Note is very light and easy to hold  even it is a 5.
The performance of Lenovo K3 Note is poor even worst  
 As many other thousands of lucky shoppers  I too have been able to grab one K3 Note in the First Flash Sale on 8th July and received the shipment on 14th  presumably not very quick from Flipkart for the shoppers without Flipkart First subscription .
This is my second K3 Note.
The reasons why I picked this phone was that I thought that it would be better than my note 2 or if not better it would be it s equivalent.
i buy lenovo k3 note and i am facing problem that my device not show any wifi network and i replaced it and i got new device but in new device same problem is here bad phone   
Available RAM is 800mb approx which is less than My remdi Note 3G but its doenst pose a serious threat.
Facing following issues with the new K3 note phone bought from Flipkart  
Verdict  I am fully satisfied with the phone its awesome truly killer note value for money
Performance of Lenovo K3 note is very bad.
even cheaper phonescompared to k3 note have backlit buttons
Finally I find Lenovo K3 Note the best among these mobiles given above that too under 10000 .
hi friends i used this Lenovo K3 Note from last 30 days.
 I have using Lenovo K3 note last one week and it is very good mobile.
6 is the maximum sar value allowed and below that it is safe  k3 note 1.
Note  After the latest marshmallow update performance is way better.
1 is available but K3 Note dose not have the update.
All are mediocre and K3 Note is better than others.
--------------------------------------------------------
hours  -9
Then I switched off the phone and kept it idle for few hours.
It takes 4 hours to Charge from 0 to 100  which is not at all good.
Charging time is high its take 4 hours to charge complete
Can be deal breaker for people whho use the handset for long hours.
Battery lasts for minimum 24 hours with continuous 4G   Wireless use
and I don t play any games on the phone  just simple surfing and its battery goes from 100 to 15  in just an hour and when you charge it  it takes around 3 hours of continuous charging to get to 100 .
8 hours of daily calling with phone over the ear.
Slow charging  it takes 2 hours of time to charge completely when running apps are closed 
It takes about 2 and a half hours  at max 2 hours 40 minutes  to fully charge the device  from 0  to 100 .
Well on aper it says 2900mAh battery  but maybe because of the large screen and more RAM usage  it hardly will last 7 hours on continuous 3G usage.
Yesterday I spent nearly 7 golden hours.
1  Sar value   Lenovo has clearly instructed not to talk long hours by keeping near ears  ideal to use head phones or speaker 
battery is average on heavy usage it lasts 6 hours on continuous 3G and other gaming stuffs.
 Heavy user and I am using this from last 28 hours since delivered  no issues at all.
The device is good but the battery back up is very poor  it takes 4 hours to completely charged and within 3 hours the battery is drained out completely with normal usage in 3G.
--------------------------------------------------------
light in weight  -9
Poor Front Camera   For lenovo k3 back camera is acceptable in both low light and daylight.
The processor works fine  Battery is decent  Touch is good  Light weight.
First of all its price  light weight  touch  1.
Camera during dull light may be a little problem  but in this price range it is worth enough.
Without the LED lighting  it is a bit uncomfortable to find and press the buttons in low light.
 Very smart and light weight mobile and also stylish look.
the software and playing game performance is nice no heating problem  light weight nice specifications.
In the first impression of the phone  it feels light in weight and looks very premium.
fully satisfied with daylight  low light   flash images.
Good weight distibution
I have recently purchased this phone   I m enjoying with this phone its vmxamera is very nice even in low light bt the processer takes almost more than 1 gb ram bt still works soo fast 
5. camera performance is awesome however low light pictures are avg
Both the front n rear camera does a great job in day light but lacks in low light.
after watching reviews my mindset was like  light as paper  but ya some weight is good for grip  so no complaints here   
 Its very easy to handle due to its light weight.
Rear Camera is awesome in light but decreases clarity in low light.
It is feather weight and looks are pretty  beautiful  gorgeous and all the synonyms of the same.
No back light capacitive keys 
What I feel is the weight is due to battery only  if u hold the device without battery its just as holding very few papers.
Rear cam can be better in low light but as said chalta hai its more than what imagined from phone at 10k.
Anyway  putting the dual flash on makes the camera quality rich even on low light.
Though I have clicked few pics from the 13MP rear shooter I noticed flash of the phone fills in enough light to illuminate the object in low light.
Camera is good  but in low light it gives average performance 
Pictures in low light are not really that great.
Colors are good  skin tones good  even low light is good.
1. cam is not so good in off light but acceptable for 10k
Display is awesome  Weight less  No heat issues  I played Asphalt game for 30 mins.
3. weight are good.
As a smartphone photographer the device is very good but in low light a bit crappy but adjustable.
Takes good pictures even in low light.
Fully satisfied with daylight  low light   flash images.
The product is great  very light weight  snappy and responsive.
Photos clicked in daylight are better than the ones clicked at low light.
About the outlook  it s really nice and Light weight.
But pictures taken in low light are little noisy.
Regarding Usage its good till now  Display is awesome  camera quality is good for Primary Camera  slim design  light weight  dual micro sim set  sound is good.
1. on back light for the buttons 
In spite of having such a big size it is super light on weight.
But front camera under low light is pathetic.
But the ambient light sensor doesnt work properly in low lit areas and show weird response.
 4. looks awesome   slim   low weight 
But low light photography without flash does attract a lot of notice  same with the 5MP front camera its low light images are not impressive.
Light weight and lookwise very good.
However in my experience the low light  night shots  were amazingly good.
not excellent at low light 
It is super light for its size.
Camera is good in nicely lit areas but low light photography on this device is not really good.
There is some noise in both back and front camera while used in artificial light.
--------------------------------------------------------
high end games  -9
  CPU is powerful  GPU is average  will do perfectly fine for general gaming  haven t tested very heavy games on it
I also notice some really cool and nice features which are not available with some high end phones.
Now come to heavy usage like playing Asphalt 8  Clash of Clans or other games you will notice that these application is lacking in performance and hangs a lot.
Heaven for Gaming it play heavy games smoothly no lag you can play 2 or 3 games at multitasking.
i buy this phone by reading most of the expert reviews but no one mention that device becomes so hot while playing high graphic games.
2. some of the loaded games are lame 
Also Gaming performance is not at all good for high end games like Asphalt 8  though for low end game it work nice.
I did a 5 hr marathon download  surfing  youtube  games  video rec  etc session on first day  after full charge  it went through everything like a breeze.
5. great for playing games
in gaming when you play high end games like asphalt 8 deadtrigger.
i have noticed some lag and drops in frame in some heavy games like asphalt 8  NOVA while they play better on A7000.
Now what else u want from K3 note its a damn cool phone with sexy looks with high end specification and HD display in Rs.
b  During playing games crady crazy with in 5 phone getting heated 
Everything is good about the device except for heating which i feel sometimes when i play heavy games or play video.
Game performance good but not excellent  on running heavy games like asphalt I occasionally noted frames missing  device becomes laggy after using it for some time and decreased responsiveness
cant play heavy games like asalpht8 mortal combat 5  gets heated up crazily
Guys if you compare with phones like galaxy s6 and other high end phones  you will find many shortcomings.
powered hardware  it is no surprise that the phone manages rich visuals on graphic intensive games  tested with Modern Combat 4  with no noticeable stutter lag.
Because high end graphical games cannot be played fluently  like asphalt 8  there will be some lags and frames skips .
The Lenovo K3 Note is a perfect example of the new trend where smartphones can be priced at very competive prices and yet give even higher end handsets a run for their money.
We also get an option of uninstalling pre installed apps which is great  Performance is awesome  apps open close quickly without lagging  games are smooth too.
Overheating when play games for minimum 5mins.
in high end games some frame drops are there as there too much pressure on the GPU for supporting the FULL HD screen 
I tried to tell him that its not good and the phone is heating even I am playing small games  but the executive gave me a rude reply by saying that the issue is resolved and if you are not satisfied that you have to approach Lenovo service center.
Gaming sucks  huge frame drops and lag even in small games like Angry Birds 2 and in big games like Asphalt 8  Modern Combat 5  etc.
1. best display and can be compared to any higher end mobiles
you can install trending popular games like CandyCrush 2048 TempleRun SubwaySurf BeachBugby BouncySpeed CrossyRoad NinJump RacingMoto StickCricket etc.
I love the feature of this phone  all latest and present high end specification having with reasonable price.
My review on Lenovo k3 Note in comparision with high end mobile devices like  OnePlus One  and  Xiaomi MI.
Heavy Games lags abit.
Slight lag on some heavy games.
3  Gaming  Lags with high end games and gets heated up.
No lagging even with heavy games Tested with Asphalt 8 
gets heatup while playing high end games.
Company boasts true  that it gives high score in processing etc  but if you happen to load any heavy games  it becomes too hot  and slows down drastically.
I have installed heavy games like ASPHALT 8  MC5  SIX GUNS  NFS MW.
Best display to watch HD movies  quality of picture is similar to high end sony phones.
4  Games   browse times very heating issues   
Games  Plays all high end games smoothly .
The phone heats up on medium outdoor usage and when you play high end games  understandbly because its octa core  at the point right below the camera  guess that s where the cpu is .
it is only recommended for those who wont play much games and use for calling max 
Not very good for playing heavy games.
Gaming  Games are running pretty smooth  but there is some problem with gameloft games mc5 asphalt8.
but caual games runs smoothly without any lag.
over all its a good phone but don t expect much as an high end phone.
Heavy games like Asphalt.
 2. when ever you play the games in this mobile your getting heat in mobile
Dolby Atmos is good provided you have high end Headset like Skull Candy for which you would need to spend another 500 Rs  .
After playing heavy games even an hour also din t observed heat
Yes it is having a few shortcomings but so do other Phones in the market and at the price point we can t expect the features of the High End Smartphones.
it runs quite fast till it gets heated  once it gets heated up  you might feel the lag especially if you are playing high graphical games like Asphalt  Nova.
Frankly it heats up near ear piece while talking n in High end games every phone heats so not a big deal
2. battery heats up a little while playing high end games and Browsing 38 degres .
and other one is it hangs when we play games.
16 GB internal with a free space of 11  GB enough to load heavy games and data.
7 true octacore  if you play games like asphalt  den it wont work smoothly  but in my other phone yureka with 1.
If you are specific about gaming and camera  I would say avoid this phone but for general usage like me with casual games it is a fantastic value for money device at Rs.
Thankfully there s no lag  even with high end games but need to clear it from the recent menu once you are out of the game.
Battery  Removable 3000 mAh battery  Its a Power Beast Battery which lasts at least 24hrs on continuous playing games online  browsing  checking mails  chatting.
Usable for average gaming but minor lags in high end games.
The phone does heat up while using high end games  but I havent experience it while continuous use of wifi.
though some high end games dont run as smoothly.
 Its Amazingly awesome phone at this range  Looks Premium  build greatly  Very light at weight  Screen quality is awesome  Run 1080p videos without any lag issue  Games runs great without heating issue.
--------------------------------------------------------
experience  8
Vibrant colours making watching videos and reading books a good experience.
So  my overall experience with  Lenovo Flipkart  has been really disappointing.
DOLBY ATMOS is really good  but please chose good earphones to experience the best audio experience.
com the new logistic partner for Flipkart  I have faced a very worst experience from them the field delivery boys are providing fake reports as the customer is not available  the delivery address is not correct and when I call customer car of the delivery.
The rest of the features seemed to be OK during my short experience with K3 note.
worst experience.
I am frequent buyer of Mobiles from Flipkart and had a great experience but after purchasing this product I must say its was an horrible experience .
that s too bad experience 
2Gb of RAM adds upto the smooth using experience.
it has effected the overall touch experience as it had dust saved in the screen.
what a horrible experience you have
i didnt experience any lag or misses till now after 1 week usage.
I had totally worst experience with this phone as well as support.
Please donot purchase Lenovo K3 Note  as this is a dumb phone launched by Lenovo  I had worst experience during last 1 month of use.
such a fantastic experience with DOLBY ATMOS.
My overall experience has been satisfactory.
Gaming Experience is good.
I have tested with samsung note 3 neo headphones and its really good the sound experience.
Gaming Experience is also fine.
In my experience by calling less than   5 minute  using this phone i am having earache  heavy ear pain   and Headache also .
like 360 degrees surround sound experience via headsets and it just does it  
My personal experience with the lenovo k3 note has been deeply rewarding.
Dolby Atmos makes sound experience rich
Quite a good experience with high graphic settings.
Last but not the least Im sorry for a large review but I wanted to give my full experience about this phone.
real bad experience from Lenovo.
The video recorded on this phone can be played on 40  TV and it will be very clear and sharp which is my personal experience.
gaming experience is very poor.
HD display in this price range and graphics text appear crisp and sharp  and watching multimedia content is a pleasant experience.
Same experience for 3G with decent signal as well.
But overall for daily use experience it is good.
My ever worst experience with Flipkart is this.
8 days that I am using this phone and let me tell you that so far my experience is really awesome.
Really frustrated with the overall experience.
Gaming experience is nice.
overall good experience.
It has been smooth experience  with reasonable lags  till now.
The 2GB RAM supported by an octa core processor makes it smooth experience to run multiple heavy apps simultaneously.
is 9724250638 i can share you my detailed experience  you just avoid to puchase anything from flipkart now.
installed game  it was smooth experience.
--------------------------------------------------------
octa core processor  7
7ghz 4G true core processor 2GB ram  and also got a 5.
4. processor is awesome
coz the phone contains a full hd display and a large processor.
it is intel processor running ARM software.
7GHz Octa core processor and it performs very fast and smooth.
The only phone which you get in this price range is Asus Zenphone 2  it has a slower processor but has gorilla glass.
lenovo has given true octa core means all the cores have been clocked to 1.
The processor is powerful.
core processor is quite powerful with smooth multi.
good processor
very fastwith octa core   2gb ram good looking light wait good camera with smart flash loved sound etc  
Quality of Phone was also Good  Octa Core Processor and Slim too.
64 bit processor which is quite brilliant.
you are getting a dual core graphics processor which is powered by mali.
  as it is octacore and the powerful processor I didn t find any lags may be that i can say after some weeks of usage.
7 GHZ mediatek  MT6752  processor is so fast and enables smooth and faster multi tasking.
--------------------------------------------------------
with dolby atmos  7
Dolby Atmos is good provided you have high end Headset like Skull Candy for which you would need to spend another 500 Rs  .
While using internet on this mobile bit giving heat but never hang  Speed is good multi tasking  Battery back up is good  Dolby sound system Etc.
6  Dolby Atmos is good  but you need an expensive headset to go with it as well.
1  Music with Dolby Atmos feature.
Though it claims about Dolby Atmos for enhanced audio effects when I connected my Philips headphone to this phone  first thing I experienced is their volume levels are low even if I raise the volume bar to max.
DOLBY ATMOS is really good  but please chose good earphones to experience the best audio experience.
Even if you set in manual mode  the equaliser goes back to intellectual Dolby Atmos Settings.
Sound quality is pretty decent with dolby 
Sound quality is way too awesome due to Dolby Atmos provided.
Audio quality with Dolby Atmos is awesome.
Dolby atmos is great if you have a good earphone like Sennheiser.
Dolby is decent
Dolby Atmos works fine.
Sound quality with Dolby Atmos is very good.
if you have a JBL  SONY  Beats  PHILLPS etc  reputed company headphones  you are going to blast with the dolby atmos feature.
--------------------------------------------------------
value for money  6
As everyone knows  SAR Value was quite high.
I had purchase this phone and have good application support as compare to other phone with low value but sad to see the product quality specially back cover.
Unlike other comments about this product there is no heating problem in my set during call and for information  given SAR value is maximum when we are using all frequency at a time i. e. having call while wi.
SAR value high
SAR value is very high
guys it s absolute value for money in this price range.
All the features are good  but the worst thing is heating problem i cannot be able to speak for 3 min also    the SAR value is very high 
6 sar value but as we know this fact that k3 also have high value within the proposed limit we would feel some sort of detachment with the phone and its a brain game.
Did anyone notice the high SAR head value   It is the highest value in the world among all phones.
Fantastic upgrade in terms of brand  configuration and best value for money.
Best value for your money compared to competion.
SR value is very high so maximum try to speak with ear phones.
Yeah  this phone is absolute value for money.
even though it is the maximum value the actual SAR value will be well less than in use but when your phones signal strength is week it will dischare its highest radiation and make you sick very soon.
6  though note that there are no proven effects of mobile based microwave radiation  a SAR value of around 40 and above is known to be harmful 
The SAR value is very high as per the govt of India permitted not good for health.
 I GOT THIS PHONE YESTERDAY  PHONE LOOKS great very light weight  but camera quality is not good  performance wise its working fine  and sar value is very high 
Although some branded phones like Moto G3 have slightly weaker specs the branded phones are value worthy  durable and far better than these chinese phones 
I was worried about the SAR value which is quite higher than my old Xperia.
010 less than the permitted value.
because that is peak value .
59 is not always that value but its the maximum sar value for this phone at a low range area.
So far as SAR value is concerned  I am not competent to comment because it is a technical issue.
Nice Mobile friendly Fantastic upgrade in terms of brand  configuration and best value for money.
SAR value is very very high so it produces more radiation and affect health 
very attractive and value for money phone.
Fantastic phone in terms of brand  configuration and best value for money.
SAR value is very high and heats up when u are talking
In Conclusion  it has the specs of a upper mid end phone but lacks the feel and arguably even the performance of one but is still good value for money.
Only value for money bad performance with respect to the spec 
frankly none as it is super value for money 
If you are specific about gaming and camera  I would say avoid this phone but for general usage like me with casual games it is a fantastic value for money device at Rs.
--------------------------------------------------------
in price range  6
Very light weight compared to other phones at same price range.
Camera during dull light may be a little problem  but in this price range it is worth enough.
Pls note  xiaomi offers better range of smart phones at the same price bracket.
However in this price range this is the best you can get.
Good in this price range with Full HD display.
Still it s the best in this price range    
The display is clear and easy on the eyes and is probably the best in its price range.
Camera photo quality is not up to the mark as compare to other with same price range.
--------------------------------------------------------
in first flash  5
6. dual led flash is an advantage
I ve been using the K3 Note bought from Flipkart on July8th  First flash sale  for 6 days now.
LED Flash is good.
 I ordered this device on its first flash sale itself  so I am using this phone over a month now.
very fastwith octa core   2gb ram good looking light wait good camera with smart flash loved sound etc  
Clarity is not good resolution is not good  zooming is not good and also low light flash everything is worst in those mobiles.
Anyway  putting the dual flash on makes the camera quality rich even on low light.
flash seems powerful  low.
--------------------------------------------------------
first flash sale  -5
 I bought this phone in a flash sale on 31 July 2015.
 Flipkart gave too many hype regarding this flash sale and convincing customers like sold in secs.
Bought a K3 Note White on flash sale.
The item is the best one and the price is great  bought in special sale   Rs 8 279 .
I boughtt k3 note in 1st flash sale  8th july  and delivered on 11th july.
I bought the mobile in the first flash sale  and have read most reviews on this phone here in flipkart.
 I ordered this device on its first flash sale itself  so I am using this phone over a month now.
bought one on the first flash sale on 8th july
I bought this phone in first flash sale  received it on 7 11 Saturday.
People who missed it on the first sale do go for the second one.
Now to get my phone i have to wait for next sale.
I got the mobile in first sale itself  I tested this for almost 1 month and then decided to write review.
I was lucky enough to grab this product in the first flash sale.
When registered for flash sale then there was included but on the day of booking it was excluded  Customer care   Flipkart said may be out of stock.
Luckily I got K3  black  on first sale.
Those who failed to grab this phone in the first flash sale  don t get disappointed.
 Bought this phone on the first flash sale.
Bought it in first flash sale and using it from 10th of july.
After waiting for 2 years I brought K3 looking at the brand during the first sale and felt lucky to grab it but after almost 1 month to certain extent I am disappointed.
Got a white one thru the flash sale.
Just try to grab this in the next sale  
What I have observed is  whatever the products Flipkart is selling in the name of flash sale are mostly faulty pieces.
 Bought this phone in first flash sale on 8th july at 3PM.
if u want to buy on next sale then go for it without any hesitation.
Lucky to grab Killer Note during the first sale only  
I recently ordered this product on open sale  Independence day offer  and received the product within 4 days.
I did get one in the first flash sale but decided to opt out and finally got this in second flash sale.
I bought this phone on 1st flash sale and following are my observartions using it for 1 days.
 Had bought in flash sale seeing the specifications.
I got my k3 note on Saturday after the first flash sale.
Bought it in next sale with in a day delivery so that i dont face same issue again as my previous mobile was broken.
I was expecting this phone to be launched and brought on first flash sale.
But I have encountered a few things on using it that tell me that it isn t really as good as the specs and the flash sale marketing  gimmick  make it out to be.
My colleague had bought lenovo a600 plus in a flash sale and same was faulty  the volume up button was not working.
Managed to get this mobile in first flash sale and got delivered the next day.
 I was quite excited when booked this killer note on the first flash sale.
I got my k3note at the very first flash sale held on 8th July and delivered on 13th July.
I have bought in flipkart in flash sale  got delivered on next day   
But People should look at other good and maybe even a bit more expensive phones Samsung  HTC  first to make a good informed choice  before falling for the flash sale and buying this one.
got the killer note in first sale.
I booked my phone on 15th 3pm sale for the white one and voila i got it on 16th itself .
 I bought Lenovo K3 on first flash sale.
I bought this mobile on first flash sale and writing this review after using in around 10 days.
No doubt they re creating so much hype and selling this shit in the name of flash sale.
2015 through flash sale.
i received the indian first sale lenovo k3 note today.
i was luckiest customer to get this phone in first sale.
I got lucky to make it in the sale  you can certainly try the next time.
 It s been around two weeks that I have been using the Lenovo K3 Note  after I managed to bag it in the very first sale.
This review is after using the phone for more than 30 days  1st flash sale  
Hi I bought this product on 8th July which was the 1st flash sale.
 Guys  was disappointed when was unable to get this phone in first sale.
I ordered Lenovo K3 note from flash sale by flipkart on 8th july 2015.
Got it through the First flash sale.
Firstly  I would like to talk about the flash sale idea of any phone  which makes a mockery of sales  anyways i got this phone on the 3rd attempt of trying  that too i received after more than a week because of some vendor issue  which was however acknowledged by Flipkart too.
I ve been using the K3 Note bought from Flipkart on July8th  First flash sale  for 6 days now.
I got this phone on the first flash sale  and believe it or not  the phone was delivered in just 2 days  Kudos to Flipkart for that 
 I had bought this Phone in August 26th Sale but due to a Dead Pixel Issue on Screen  had to get it replaced  the replacement piece arrived on September 2nd and it was just fine.
 I purchased this product on their first flash sale that is on 8th July.
Really I feel very bad for putting sale on flipkart.
 I bought this smartphone in first sale.
This time on first sale I bought LENOVO K3 note  It didnt disappoint me in terms of value for money.
I bought the phone on first sale nd got the phon on friday.
Now  I am helpless to sale this phone 3rd person.
Got it in first sale and delivered on 10 july.
I bought this phone in last flash sale.
--------------------------------------------------------
screen guard  -5
As it doesn t come with the gorilla screen i recommend you guys to put a tempered glass for additional protection instead of using a normal screen guard.
2  Screen guard supplied with is not good.
2  You will need a new screen guard because the one that comes with it is a dirt and finger print magnet.
Very good screen guard comes with the pack
Screen guard is pathetic.
Came with a free screen guard  installed from a local retailer but unfortunately there were bubbles in.
In the box you would find the usb cable with adapater along with a free screen guard .
--------------------------------------------------------
13 mp  5
Camera quality is pathetic  13MP  is equal to 5 MP
 Primary 13 MP  4128 x 3096 pixels  autofocus  dual.
I m writing this comments after using my Lenovo K3 mobile from 2 months ago  its really worth  all the features are working awesome and camera quality is double super  13 MP Primary Camera 5 MP Secondary Camera   HD videos is good  With 16 GB internal storage  you can store more of your favourite photos  music and games worry.
great phone with 2 gb ram  16gb rom  13 mp back and 5 mp front autofocus camera.
13mp rear is look a like 5 mp
13MP primary and 5 MP Rear Front  Cam.
13 MP primary camera works perfectly in lighting condition but in low light area and artificial light area we have to make sure that phone is steady while capturing or else the photo will be blurred same for secondary camera also.
--------------------------------------------------------
5 inch screen  4
5 Inch full HD display is really good.
5 inches  it feels little longer in hand for a moderate sized hand while other phones with the same screen size are relatively not too tall. 
5 inches screen which is very beautiful with excellent viewing angles  Its a treat to watch movies on the Full HD display  totally impressed  10 10 
5  is so big 5 inch is ideal.
--------------------------------------------------------
pre installed apps  4
I am simple apps no gaming or something.
This mobile was too much waste reason is xendar and share it dos not connected to other mobiles if u have connect another mobile that mobile also be hanging this mobile apps dos not connected another mobile my openian is giving rating is 0 rating so my suggestion is SONY better THIS PRICE 
7 Ghz I do not use any heavy apps.
loaded apps make it worse.
After installation of all required apps such as whatsapp  facebook  instragram etc.
1000mb available without any apps and 400.
I uninstalled most of the pre installed apps and I haven t installed any heavy apps in my phone.
In fact I have installed only 11 extra apps in my device other than the inbuilt apps.
Mobile lags when using heavy apps obvious with mediatek processor 
Internal security apps also good 
Too much of preinstalled apps.
The 2GB RAM supported by an octa core processor makes it smooth experience to run multiple heavy apps simultaneously.
Touch lags happen because out of 2GB RAM  1GB itself is consumed by phone s UI and remaing memory is insufficient to manage apps and other basic operations.
Meanwhile other apps runs as well.
They give crape solution to the problem faced  like disable apps and things like this.
on opening heavy apps it hangs and doesnt respond for some time .
it lasts more than 30hrs with basic apps and moderate use.
loaded apps is great.
They declined handset s replacement request after remote examing the phone and suggested to force stop running apps to free up memory.
8. has some great apps pre installed
installed apps  which can be uninstalled  some are sticky though.
installed apps are great and no issues of over.
K3 gives you HD display and Dolby Sound  You can delete unwanted apps  customize storage memory as per your needs  no overheating  not faced till now  battery drainage bit fast on usage.
 limited to two apps only  automatic answering the calls when placed in ears and so many of them.
There are some useless apps preinstalled that cannot be uninstalled.
Works good even when multiple apps are open.
one thing to note is that lenovo uses cheap hardware many internal apps such as music app callender app memo app etc are the 3rd party apps only few are of lenovo.
I didnt find any lags unless heavy apps   mostly games   are running in the background.
And other essential apps consumes around 500 Which is very high and in total you have only left with ram of 500 MB.
5 gb i. e when clearing the recent apps we got to know about that 
Available RAM is less than 900 MBs without any apps running which gets occupied quickly as soon as you run other apps. 
Really good for installing apps
All because I am an average mobile user of calls  message  videos  even movies  games  photography and other apps.
switching apps is fast and multitasking is butter smooth  I switched over 10 apps on background and it produces at Real.
Phone hangs if two apps are open at one time.
Flexible with every Apps.
Comes with useless Apps which cant be uninstalled sometimes and use the RAM.
The performance is decent with a minor lag sometimes and that too when I have multiple apps open in the background.
May be with less apps it might be killer.
Response time is pretty impressive  even for heavy apps.
Too many unwanted apps.
Dolby Atmos is an app like you download other apps from store just to improve music quality 
2 Memory shown as 16 GB but actually it is 11GB  5Gb taken by apps is fine for me  but it have only 4GB free space just after clicking few pics  P .
Else it would come down to 400 300 200MB of RAM with more number of recent apps.
7  This phone comes with an led notification light and YES it is working for other apps too.
The RAM usage is more than usual  I am using the very basic apps like gmail  whats app  Music  and after these running application I am getting only 445 MB of free RAM out of 2 GB.
Really good for installing apps.
preinstalled apps are little awkward but you can easily unistall it.
I ve no longer have to clear recent apps   reboot my phone at regular intervals 
61 GB free which is sufficient as apps that are installed in the future can be shifted to the SD card if it is supported by the developer.
600mb with usage fo upto 11 apps together.
RAM optimization needs rework  on first boot you will get around 950 mb but i have seen fore close of apps when multi tasking.
My use is basically browsing and apps.
CAMERA   Excellent  Camera quality is excellent but the default camera application is not that good it take time to open  download google camera or camera 360 or some other apps .
Many people are complaing about RAM  I suggest don t use Facebook app  use lite version  and remove chrome  Google search  and other nonse apps from Google.
brightness  I take around 30 40 mins of calls  lots of what s app texts  checking emails and using apps such as freelancer and upwork  an hour of music and another hour of surfing .
--------------------------------------------------------
lenovo k3 note  4
Flipkart delivered a LENOVO mobile K3 Note   but no where mentione about K  noe in mobile  in adds mentioned that battery capacity is 30000mAH  nut I received only 2900mAH capacity.
hi every one k3 is awesome mobile touch response is very sharp and smooth and heavy graphics advanced futures in this price range mobile but heating problem is disoppointed me but heating issue is solve in service center can u visit your nearest lenovo authorised center and update u r mobile os so one of care in secunderabad sri sai cumminications 1 st floor shop no 26  hardy complex m. g. roadopp chermas  secunderabad 500003  so guys i think my advice is very help full who is suffering frm heating problem this mobile thank u 
I ordered and got new Lenovo K3 Note.
i hve seen lenovo 6000   7000 k3 but k3 is unique in performance 
 Lenovo K3 mobile battery is not performing well  even am not comparing to any one because he is not stand in front of anyone of the mobile phone battery.
Lenovo k3 note is just perfect of all the budget smartphones available in market today  JUST GOO FOR IT without any hesitation 
and today I received this excellent K3 noteThankyou Lenovo  
Compared to Lenovo A7000 s 720p display  the new K3 Note has a higher.
Lenovo K3 Note doesn t look much different from other Lenovo Android phones.
Design 10 10  Lenovo K3 Note is very light and easy to hold  even it is a 5.
few days back i received my most awaited Lenovo K3.
The performance of Lenovo K3 Note is poor even worst  
Overall  The new Lenovo K3 is worth Money with all its features and smooth Android running with loads of apps and games   Definitely worth Money.
 Flipkart is not at all bothered for there customer satisfaction they are just abt to make money the phone i buyed from flipkart is not at all good LENOVO K3 NOTE its hanging a lot and also its dialer is not displaying we have complained about the same but flipkart is not bothered at all they just connected to technical team which is of no use and atlast they stated that they cant change or refund the amt or product.
For 9999 k you can t get better than lenovo k3.
i buy lenovo k3 note and i am facing problem that my device not show any wifi network and i replaced it and i got new device but in new device same problem is here bad phone   
 i have received new Lenovo k3note against my order no.
 I bought Lenovo K3 on first flash sale.
OVERALL   LENOVO K3 IS A GOOD PHONE AND I RECOMMEND IT TO YOU GUYZ .
overall lenovo k3 note is a better ph till now 
Performance of Lenovo K3 note is very bad.
And also  no where i ve seen this Product as  Lenovo K3 Note  except on the BOX and while i ve connected this phone to my laptop  my lappy identified this mobile as Lenovo A7000.
the heating issue which happens in Lenovo A6000  is because of this micro sd card so this trick will probably prevent the same in Lenovo K3 Note.
Note   Covers  screenguards or tempered glass of Lenovo a7000 fit perfectly with Lenovo k3 note since both devices have same dimensions.
10000  i am using this phone from 6 months  till now i am facing no problem very satisfied with this awesome lenovo k3 note.
Finally I find Lenovo K3 Note the best among these mobiles given above that too under 10000 .
hi friends i used this Lenovo K3 Note from last 30 days.
 I have using Lenovo K3 note last one week and it is very good mobile.
i am using lenovo k3 from past 8 days and have listed some cons and pros  
--------------------------------------------------------
killer note  4
 I was quite excited when booked this killer note on the first flash sale.
Lucky to grab Killer Note during the first sale only  
Verdict  I am fully satisfied with the phone its awesome truly killer note value for money
This is  killer Note.
 lenove k3 note is really killer note but i got defected item.
Go for it guys  It is a reall Killer Note  
--------------------------------------------------------
vibe ui  4
Vibe UI is not that good  it feels like a half baked version of android with missing features.
The VIBE UI is really frustrating.
vibe ui is awesome with secure zone management but when u scroll pages it lags sometimes.
The Lenovo Vibe UI is not customisable but very smooth.
Lenovos Vibe UI is not great as compared to Samsungs Touch Wiz.
Vibe UI is attractive and useful.
4 Good UI  Vibe UI 2.
Yes VIbe UI is good but can be really improved could make some improvements from APUS Launcher .
4  No lags at all and Vibe UI is great  although I m a big fan of stock UI 
Touch response is good  Vibe UI is also remarkable.
Vibe UI is very smooth and you will not feel any difference between Android 5.
VIBE UI is very boring and limits myself  hence i have downloaded Cobo Launcher which is really great and phone looks lot better and beautiful.
Nice Vibe UI  not the best but definitely good.
2  vibe ui is not give the excitement of lollipop.
--------------------------------------------------------
playing games  4
Now come to heavy usage like playing Asphalt 8  Clash of Clans or other games you will notice that these application is lacking in performance and hangs a lot.
Battery  Removable 3000 mAh battery  Its a Power Beast Battery which lasts at least 24hrs on continuous playing games online  browsing  checking mails  chatting.
i buy this phone by reading most of the expert reviews but no one mention that device becomes so hot while playing high graphic games.
it runs quite fast till it gets heated  once it gets heated up  you might feel the lag especially if you are playing high graphical games like Asphalt  Nova.
After playing heavy games even an hour also din t observed heat
I tried to tell him that its not good and the phone is heating even I am playing small games  but the executive gave me a rude reply by saying that the issue is resolved and if you are not satisfied that you have to approach Lenovo service center.
5. great for playing games
Not very good for playing heavy games.
b  During playing games crady crazy with in 5 phone getting heated 
--------------------------------------------------------
back cover  -3
2 The back cover gives good grip and is scratchless.
6  Build quality  worst  made up of cheap plastic back cover makes sound if u hold it tightly.
Battery back cover is loose
and the back cover is very thin and also some applications are not installing .
Cons   Back cover looks cheap  no earphones 
Build quality of the phone also was not upto the mark  main reason was the back cover felt like a low quality plastic and the home and volume buttons are attached on it gives a low quality design feel.
The back cover is thin but of good quality and as i received the white color its actually pearl white .
The back cover is a little plastic.
2. back cover is made of cheap plastic which is not durable  you will have to buy strong back cover.
Same as Lenovo A7000 same back panel so same cover can be used
but the back cover is of very poor quality 
It had a back cover  but still.
5 back Cover is very thin.
Radiant shiny white back cover  not pure white
Touch feel is really good and back cover though white but is nice shiny and is not getting dirt spots fingerprints.
The plastic back cover is loose from bottom and sides  whenever the phone is in hand  the sound of loose areas can be heard and felt.
The back cover is made of rubber.
Phone looks so premium  back cover is well designed with Matt look and moreover this phone is so light and easy to carry.
--------------------------------------------------------
1 gb ram  3
61 GB free which is sufficient as apps that are installed in the future can be shifted to the SD card if it is supported by the developer.
User gets around 11 GB  which is decent at the price point of this phone.
16 GB internal with a free space of 11  GB enough to load heavy games and data.
Now it is smooth though 1 GB ram is always occupied by the OS.
Available RAM is less than1GB.
os occupies 1gb of ram.
7 GHz processor 2 GB ram and 16 GB large storage up to expandable 32 GB 
31 GB free on first boot.
Only 1 GB Ram is actually available for use because the other 1 GB RAM is used by the Operating System
8 gb of internal and only 1 gb of ram can be availed.
and one of the important thing is it was not reading full 2gb of ram its was of about 1.
At first boot around 1GB of RAM is free and depending on what apps you install at any given point I noticed that around 800 MB to 900MB is free with apps running in the backgroud.
Pros  Ocatcore  2GB RAM  16GB expandable upto 32GB  Anroid version Lollipop  Camera 13MP   5MP  quality is good  
Very poor Ram Management  at first boot you will get 1 GB free RAM but after installing a few applications you can never get 1gb free RAM.
Even though the phone is 2GB RAM  available RAM is always   1GB.
Minimum 1 GB Ram is always occupied for OS and preinstalled Apps.
Though it has a 2GB RAM  1GB of it is used by the OS so the actual available RAM is always around 1GB or less.
5 GB free from the 16GB internal storage.
Storage  16 GB is ample.
2 GB RAM sounds very attractive  but more than 1 GB is consumed by the OS.
I m writing this comments after using my Lenovo K3 mobile from 2 months ago  its really worth  all the features are working awesome and camera quality is double super  13 MP Primary Camera 5 MP Secondary Camera   HD videos is good  With 16 GB internal storage  you can store more of your favourite photos  music and games worry.
Though in specifications RAM shown is 2GB but less than 1GB is available to us as rest is occupied by the Operating System of this phone
11 gb is free.
--------------------------------------------------------
to service center  -3
Deposited the phone in Service center and they told for mother board replacement already more than 30 request at the same center .
Service is slow and many are coming to the center again and again.
Third class phone worst touch screen i am very dissatisfy with service center bcoz last 1 month my mobile don t give back from customer service center so i suggest all of you don t buy any product of lenovo 
2015 to a nearby service center   at Cuddalore .
I did t find proper authorized service center in Hyderabad.
I visited the authorized service center and they told me that it is not covered under guarantee and will cost 5800 Rs  58  of mobiles cost .
Parts are not available  service call center is of no use.
--------------------------------------------------------
thinkpad laptops  3
The touch on the back looks feels very soft and has the feel of old thinkpad laptops 
 The touch on the back looks feels very soft and has the feel of old thinkpad laptops
--------------------------------------------------------
great  3
Great hard ware  
Great internal storage and im using 16GB memory card so it s 32Gb phone  .
Great sound  Dolby Atmos really does the job well.
Great audio  Great Processor   Great option in Device Setting Which is Excellent.
Full Hd Great performance  Decent camera  Great sound effects on headphones.
--------------------------------------------------------
for k3 note  2
Lenovo k3 note is just perfect of all the budget smartphones available in market today  JUST GOO FOR IT without any hesitation 
Performance of Lenovo K3 note is very bad.
The performance of Lenovo K3 Note is poor even worst  
 As many other thousands of lucky shoppers  I too have been able to grab one K3 Note in the First Flash Sale on 8th July and received the shipment on 14th  presumably not very quick from Flipkart for the shoppers without Flipkart First subscription .
--------------------------------------------------------
heavy  -2
If you are a Heavy gamer this mobile is not that much great for Heavy Gaming.
 Light on weight  heavy on features.
might be not suitable for game lovers   Heavy   due to mediatek processor used .
--------------------------------------------------------
pixel density  2
Its screen has an excellent pixel density of 401 ppi.
High quality camera with high pixel density
--------------------------------------------------------
gaming  2
never noticed any lag till now after using it for 5 days and done heavy gaming like fifa mc 5 ucf etc.
I am not a very much gaming freak and hence would not comment on the gaming performance as I did not play high definition games on this phone.
 2  little bit of heating not much only when heavy gaming for long
Without heavy gaming and much more phone calls  in battery save mode  NOT super saver  the cell stands for 75 hours.
For smooth gaming  just set the graphics to medium.
i would say if your usage is more towards multimedia consumption and using device to chat of social sites along with some casual gaming then at this price  you have no other option.
Suitable for high graphic gaming.
As far as gaming is concerned i think both are almost same.
battery is average on heavy usage it lasts 6 hours on continuous 3G and other gaming stuffs.
 It downloading speed is fantastic and net surffing and gaming is outstanding 
GAMING not bad   Gaming disappoints me .
Gaming 9 10  Casual gaming on this phone is really smooth  Subway surfers  candy crush etc.
With medium usage  Wifi for about 10 hours  a little gaming asphalt  jumping tiles    it comes for a little more than a day.
Usable for average gaming but minor lags in high end games.
But with very nominal gaming.
--------------------------------------------------------
2 gb ram  2
Only  850MB is available of the 2GB RAM.
Spec says supports upto 32 GB but I was able to load my 64 GB micro SD card just fine.
built and 32 GB expandable memory 
RAM  Lenovo K3 Note sports 2GB DDR3 RAM and is good enough to cruise through graphic.
Now it is smooth though 1 GB ram is always occupied by the OS.
The one thing which I should mention here is that the free RAM available most of the time  out of 2 GB only around 600 MB is shown free.
Available RAM is less than1GB.
os occupies 1gb of ram.
little slow and hung when coupled with 32 GB external card.
Only 850mb RAM is free out of 2gb
7 GHz processor 2 GB ram and 16 GB large storage up to expandable 32 GB 
5 GB RAM gone  If OS takes that much RAM than this phone is not what we are looking for.
Only 1 GB Ram is actually available for use because the other 1 GB RAM is used by the Operating System
The RAM usage is more than usual  I am using the very basic apps like gmail  whats app  Music  and after these running application I am getting only 445 MB of free RAM out of 2 GB.
The k3note having 2 GB of RAM but it cant performing multiple tasking.
8 gb of internal and only 1 gb of ram can be availed.
and one of the important thing is it was not reading full 2gb of ram its was of about 1.
At first boot around 1GB of RAM is free and depending on what apps you install at any given point I noticed that around 800 MB to 900MB is free with apps running in the backgroud.
2 GB free for user when i checked.
Available RAM is only 650 MB out of 2 GB.
Pros  Ocatcore  2GB RAM  16GB expandable upto 32GB  Anroid version Lollipop  Camera 13MP   5MP  quality is good  
Very poor Ram Management  at first boot you will get 1 GB free RAM but after installing a few applications you can never get 1gb free RAM.
So on an average  I could see 500mb to 800mb ram being available  though it has 2GB ram which is NOT the case with Moto G  3rd Gen  or Lenovo 6000 plus  may be they weren t Full HD display 
Even though the phone is 2GB RAM  available RAM is always   1GB.
Minimum 1 GB Ram is always occupied for OS and preinstalled Apps.
Though it has a 2GB RAM  1GB of it is used by the OS so the actual available RAM is always around 1GB or less.
very fastwith octa core   2gb ram good looking light wait good camera with smart flash loved sound etc  
People complain that of 2GB  only 400MB RAM is available.
2 GB RAM sounds very attractive  but more than 1 GB is consumed by the OS.
I m writing this comments after using my Lenovo K3 mobile from 2 months ago  its really worth  all the features are working awesome and camera quality is double super  13 MP Primary Camera 5 MP Secondary Camera   HD videos is good  With 16 GB internal storage  you can store more of your favourite photos  music and games worry.
Though in specifications RAM shown is 2GB but less than 1GB is available to us as rest is occupied by the Operating System of this phone
2GB ram but its available 650MB. 
In spite being 2 gb ram I can get only 500.
Only 850mb out of 2GB RAM is available for use.
800 ram is available of 2gb.
 I bought this product recently after reading wonderful reviews  but I am disappointed to see only less than 500 mb RAM is free out of 2GB RAM.
--------------------------------------------------------
thanks to flipkart  2
 At first I ve to say thanks Flipkart for very good servicing while delivering this product .
Thanks to Flipkart  I was able to return the handset and get the refund.
--------------------------------------------------------
fingerprint magnet  -2
1  The screen is a fingerprint magnet and comes across as reflective.
Plus the screen is more like a fingerprint magnet.
The screen is hell of a fingerprint magnet but I would recommend going for a tempered glass protection and it wont bother you anymore.
1  Screen is a fingerprint magnet
--------------------------------------------------------
priority pass  -2
 I was one of the lucky few to get the priority pass for the K3 Note.
I was one of the lucky few to get the priority pass for the K3 Note.
--------------------------------------------------------
social networking  2
you wont get a good quality picture for uploading in social networking sites.
--------------------------------------------------------
smooth  2
Specs are amazing  the performance is buttery smooth.
I played high graphics games like Relic run  Need for speed most wanted   gameplay was super smooth.
I am not going by the Benchmark score  Gaming its smooth and gets warm while playing for a while thats normal I think.
The touch is also super smooth.
--------------------------------------------------------
average  2
All because I am an average mobile user of calls  message  videos  even movies  games  photography and other apps.
5 inch screen  music quality is good  battery back up average but can last very long if kept on stand buy
Battey  average to high  
--------------------------------------------------------
front and rear  -1
camera clarity both front and rear not good 
camera is very good rear 13mp and front 5mp also.
Overall feel of the phone is good  FHD screen really works fine  battery back up is good  i am a heavy user of photo editing apps and this phone takes it all  initially i faced some lagging whilst multi tasking however its not there anymore and it works fine  13mp rear and 5mp front shooter works pretty decent especially during day light it gives very rich photos  overall  a great phone at this price.
2 Sound  Rear speaker is loud and has enough clarity.
Good rear camera quality.
However the Lenovo branding is missing on the front which makes it look a little ordinary.
The yellow rear to give them a change from the black phones they have always had.
Good Rear Camera Quality for Still Images but not Great.
Poor body design it doesn t give great look especially with white unless u put back cases and all i mean white back and black front doesnt match exactly. 
Good Front Cam 
3  Camera quality  both front and rear  is also very good   though not excellent 
have a better front camera for better selfies.
Rear is great with crisp and sharp pictures.
Camera quality is so good front cam is better than back cam 
2 good front and rear camera
--------------------------------------------------------
awesome  1
 I was lucky to get this Awesome phone in my cart the first day.
--------------------------------------------------------
1 5 days  -1
After using for next 15 days  again the same problem arose.
--------------------------------------------------------
well  -1
Well  criminal case gets some lagging in my device at least.
--------------------------------------------------------
gorilla glass protection  1
No Gorilla Glass or protection available.
--------------------------------------------------------
couple of days  1
Now comes to the performance of mobile  I am using this mobile from last couple of days and felt like why i bought this because this mobile is hanging very much like if we play any app on it in the mean while if you open another app than it is working very slowly and if you click on the back button than it keeps on the same page for some time after that its going back.
talky  can be used just for calls and messages  which can help battery last for couple of days or may be even more 
--------------------------------------------------------
sd card  1
Spec says supports upto 32 GB but I was able to load my 64 GB micro SD card just fine.
So you take the phone to Chennai for some bloody card.
third party apps don t have the permission to write to external SD card.
You cant move apps to SD card but manageable.
5. sim card is not hot swappable   even memory card too.
This phone has almost everything removable battery  sd card   dual sim   octa core   2500mah battery  OTG  dolby etc  which you can find only 10 devices all over the world.
You can also not use the external sd card applications at the same time owhen using internal memory  if you acces anyone of the memory  you ll not be able to use some of the applications such as google play store with proper wifi and internet connection.
Always popping out sim card full message  but when it is clicked no messages is seen.
--------------------------------------------------------
pros and cons  -1
Notable cons 
Following are some common pros and cons of the phone  
Cons  Available RAM  battery 
Guys  I will write pros and cons as usual but refer to my below written text on its functionality and features.
pros good display  5.
pros good battery 
cons bad bad camera  
Pros     Overall display   camera performance is too good.
Pros  overall look and style 
But the cons are reasonable as they all are solvable.
Other pros are same as other reviews
All these cons are negligible compared to all the Pros  .
These are about Killer  as we see there are not bigger cons  they are common for every phone  to say and has awesome pros.
--------------------------------------------------------
update  -1
Updated upto the last 296MB update.
Wifi HotSpot stopped working after recent update.
Also after recent update from lenovo OTA  WIFI is not working properly.
600mb free after latest 85mb update.
With the recent update  the heating is reduced but still it s there.
I hope that it can be resolved through next update .
However I noticed one problem with WiFi after the last update.
The little bugs were fixed by the small update.
Specially after the recent Update the Home Screen wall paper turns to Black and the Icons remain   after using the phone for a while it re.
He asked me to go for a system update and told me that this would resolve the issue and he hung up even before the system update was complete.
I suggest don t update.
the system was running smoothly but after the 296 MB update I am unable to connect to wifi or use xender       why     
Only inbuilt music Player Not given but google music player is given it is also great but i hop company provide new music player app in next update.
--------------------------------------------------------
at price point  -1
Better cam lenses  competitor Micromaxs Yu Yureka has good cam at low price point 
--------------------------------------------------------
wifi  1
I am using the same wifi dongle with laptop  Lumia 520  Samsung Core  Samsung Note  LG G3  Ipad Mini and I have never faced any issue like this.
Faced small issues in Wifi  high intensive gaming  Modern Combat 5.
Have requested for a return   an app was sent to me   had a hard time to download it without wifi   had to create a open wifi and then downloaded the app   but then have to wait for flipkart to call .
Reported this issue to Flipkart and asked for a return  and they arranged for a call with one of their  expert  and she told me that phone is working fine and wifi is also working while this phone won t detect any wifi network and can t use the phone as a wifi hot.
Wifi is strong
due to it my wifi stopped working.
Thought it was a software issue   did a hard reset   now after doing that   not able to enter my wifi password as the touch would nt work .
But no issue of heating while doing the same on WiFi network.
You can also not use the external sd card applications at the same time owhen using internal memory  if you acces anyone of the memory  you ll not be able to use some of the applications such as google play store with proper wifi and internet connection.
this phone is very bad  audio quality is poor  wifi is not working  not a value for a money 
The range of wifi is too small.
The Wifi signal drops very frequently once in 3.
5  inferred and NFC   WiFi direct not available.
The WiFi is very fast and both the 2 sim cards supports 4G 3G 2G networks.
on 22nd July 2015  able to placed order and delivered on 23rd july 2015 but after using 1hrs found it is defective that wifi is not working if you are two step away from modem.
--------------------------------------------------------
lenova k3 note  1
I will buy Lenova k3 note last week 31.
--------------------------------------------------------
no gorilla glass  1
And last thing I dont know which glass Lenovo has used but there is no dragontrail or Corning Gorilla Glass used but its a hardened glass so suggest you to used a glass protector.
5 to 12K as you would need to invest additional on a sd card tempered glass good pair of head ear phones  it still provides good VFM.
Gorilla Glass is missing but still screen is pretty tough.
The glass is 75  full for all you optimists.
1  Gorilla glass  You have to get a after market tempered glass fixed   an extra 150.
Missing Gorilla Glass in such big screen phone.
Reflective Glass on Display  Especially under Sunlight 
The phone doesnt come with a corning gorilla glass  which is quite common in sub 10K phones these days  but it doesnt matter as i i dint experience any scratches as been using for over a month.
it still looks good   maybe because its one glass solution  that popups everything   like on a nexus 5 .
5. display is good but not gorilaa glass.
Gorilla glass would have been helpful but overall great screen.
Lenovo name is missing in front   battery backup not so good  built quality is just ok   plastic look  no corning gorilla glass  not easy to fit in hand.
Could have implement Gorilla Glass  